Linking Prevention and Intervention to Academic Success ............A Resource Guide Commonwealth of Pennsylvania Governor Edward G. Rendell Department of Education Dr. Vicki L. Phillips, Secretary Designee Bureau of Community and Student Services Dr. Maritza Robert, Director
"Linking Prevention and Intervention to Academic Success" was the result of the collaboration and support of the subgroup of the PA Academic Standards Symposium Maximizing All Children's Success Committee "Resources for Schools and Programs."
Co-Chairs: Dr. Maritza Robert Director Bureau of Community and Student Services Department of Education Dr. Vito Forlenza Assistant Executive Director Northeast Intermediate Unit #19 Archibald, PA
Table of Contents Introduction .................................................................................................................................................................................................
1 Background Information ............................................................................................................................................................................
2 Definitions to Help Understand the Information Provided in Each Matrix ...............................................................................................
3 Mission of the Subgroup ­ Resources for Schools and Programs .............................................................................................................
4 Committee Members ..................................................................................................................................................................................
5
Matrices Alternative Education for Disruptive Children ............................................................................................................................................7 Character Education ...................................................................................................................................................................................18 Classroom Plus- Pennsylvania's Education Support Services Program ....................................................................................................23 Fatherhood Initiative ..................................................................................................................................................................................26 Education Leading to Career Training and Employment Program ...........................................................................................................33 Education Mentoring .................................................................................................................................................................................39 The Pennsylvania Homeless Initiative .......................................................................................................................................................46 Instructional Support Team........................................................................................................................................................................56 Migrant Education .....................................................................................................................................................................................60
Pregnant and Parenting Program ...............................................................................................................................................................73 Safe and Drug Free Schools and Communities .........................................................................................................................................76 Safe Schools ...............................................................................................................................................................................................81 Service Learning ........................................................................................................................................................................................91 Supplemental Education Services ..............................................................................................................................................................98 Successful Students' Partnership .............................................................................................................................................................102 Student Assistance Program ....................................................................................................................................................................115 21st Century Community Learning Centers .............................................................................................................................................120
Linking Prevention and Intervention to Academic Success Introduction Linking Prevention and Intervention to Academic Success is a practical resource guide.
It describes instructional support programs and services and their direct or indirect roles in academic performance.
The programs and services described in this guide are school and community based.
They promote academic success, personal and social development for all students, and offer a proven record of prevention and intervention to overcome barriers to learning.
Barriers to learning can include migration, language barriers, mental health issues, physical or emotional abuse, alcohol and other drug abuse, teenage pregnancy and parenting, violence in schools and communities, lack of parental involvement, homelessness, and inadequate nutrition.
An unfortunate outcome for some youth is academic failure, truancy, and dropping out.
Each program described in this guide can make a difference in a child's life.
Depending on the child's needs, one or a combination of the programs, using a comprehensive approach, can help a child overcome barriers to learning.
The resource guide provides a list of programs, services, and activities related to academic standards.
The connections to academic standards that are highlighted in this document enable educators and student support personnel to deliver services within the common context of improved academic learning.
From a national, state, and local research perspective, the resource guide provides information about the ability of student support programs, services, and activities to have a positive impact on academic performance.
This information will help school districts make decisions concerning implementation of prevention and intervention initiatives based on local needs and priorities.
Personnel who use this document will gain a greater ability to communicate the impact of these programs to everyone involved in maximizing all children's success.
1
Background Information Pennsylvania has made considerable progress in public education renewal.
The vision of linking prevention and intervention to academic success is part of the Pennsylvania Department of Education's continuing efforts to improve academic standards, assessment, and professional development.
In the summer of 2001, the Bureau of Community and Student Services and the Partnership for Educational Excellence Network (PEEN) formed the Maximizing All Children's Success Committee that developed this resource guide.
Representatives from other bureaus of the Office of Elementary and Secondary Education were part of this effort as well as the Center for Schools and Communities.
This committee brought groups that support education together to explore ways to enhance academic success for all children.
In the last decade, many discussions about education have centered on the poor academic performance of American students and how to help all children reach their fullest potential.
Educators are experiencing tremendous pressure to drive up students' scores on standardized tests.
Student assessment, standards implementation, and accountability are school priorities.
As a result, educators are forced to justify time and money spent on student services presumably geared solely to improving social and emotional aspects of children's lives despite the clear link between social and emotional competence and academic success.
The goal of standards-based renewal is to help all students reach higher levels of learning.
Including all students, in its broadest sense, is at the heart of the "standards" and the "No Child Left Behind" movements.
Thus instructional support programs that serve the diverse student population are essential strategies for education renewal as part of a school's mission.
The mission of the Bureau of Community and Student Services is to help all Pennsylvania children succeed academically and grow to be healthy and responsible citizens, productive workers and effective parents.
All of the bureau's efforts and initiatives, including this resource guide, are directed at fulfilling this mission.
To that end the bureau administered programs that are directed to student mentoring, dropout prevention, safe schools, safe and drug-free schools, student assistance, character education, pregnant and parenting teens, service-learning, education of the homeless children, migrant education, and other student needs.
These initiatives are geared to improve the social and emotional well-being of children and ultimately enhance their academic performance.
This resource guide addresses initiatives of the bureau programs geared to prevention and intervention strategies.
Other support programs such as Alternative Education for Disruptive Children, Classroom Plus, Instructional Support Team and Supplemental Education Services are also included in this resource guide.
Definitions to Help Understand the Information Provided in Each Matrix Program-This column identifies the program and provides a general description of the purpose of the program.
Most of the programs listed operate under the Bureau of Community and Student Services.
Other support programs such as Alternative Education for Disruptive Youth and Instructional Support Team are included in this resource guide.
Activities-This column provides examples of selected program activities.
Not all activities are listed.
Student Impact-This column provides examples of how activities have a direct or indirect impact on academic achievement or academic success.
Chapter 4- This column identifies how the program activities connect with Chapter 4.
Chapter 4, of the Pennsylvania Code of Education establishes rigorous academic standards and assessments to facilitate the improvement of student achievement and to provide parents and communities a measure by which school performance can be determined.
This Chapter also sets forth requirements for instruction, graduation, strategic planning and assessment based on academic standards.
State Board of Education of Pennsylvania regulations, Chapter 4 can be found on the Department of Education web site www.pde.state.pa.us.
See regulations.
Academic Standards-This column identifies how the program activities connect with academic standards.
Academic standards is what a student should know and be able to do at a specific grade level.
Understanding the content standards represent the ability of a student to explain and exhibit comprehension and recognition of the significance of a concept and its connectedness to the whole by applying knowledge in a multitude of practical ways to new and different situations.
In designing educational programs, school districts are now required to provide for student attainment of academic standards as described in Chapter 4, as well as any additional locally developed academic standards that may be described in their strategic plans.
In accordance with Chapter 4, school districts must have, at a minimum, academic standards for students in the following disciplines: Reading, Writing, Speaking and Listening Mathematics Science and Technology Environment and Ecology Health, Safety and Physical Education Civics and Government Economics 3 Geography History Arts and Humanities World Languages Family and Consumer Sciences Career Education and Work
Standards are found in the Department of Education web site www.pde.state.pa.us.
See standards.
Linking Prevention and Intervention to Academic Success was the result of the collaboration and support of the subgroup of the Committee Maximizing All Children's Success, Resources for Schools and Programs.
Mission of the Subgroup-Resources for Schools and Programs: To link prevention and intervention programs and services to academic success.
Goal 1`: To develop a practical guide that explains how specific programs relate to academic success.
Goal 2: To develop a resource or tool that can be used to link programs and services to specific Academic Standards.
Goal 3: To develop a training resource kit that can be distributed to schools and communities
4
Special thanks and acknowledgement to the subcommittee members of "Resources for Schools and Programs": Co-Chairs Dr. Maritza Robert Director Bureau of Community and Student Services Department of Education Secretary- Karen Hamm Bureau Office Bureau of Community and Student Services Nancy Avolese Department of Education State Coordinator Alternative Education for Disruptive Youth Pennsylvania Department of Education Judy Bentz Retired and Senior Volunteer Program Area Coordinator, Capital Region Dr. Daniel Felix Bureau of Community and Student Services Division of Student and Safe School Services Department of Education Eric Hartman PSLA Bernie Hoffman Consultant Sarah John PSLA Marlene Kanuck Bureau of Community and Student Services Division of Student 
Sal Lucio Superintendent Riverside School District Barbara McCloy Pittsburgh School District Instructional Support Team Shileste Morris Youth Development Manager Center for Schools and Communities Gail Arden Odorcich AIU #3 Homeless Initiative
Peggy Reiman Consultant Migrant Education Program Paula Errigo-Stoup Program Development Coordinator Migrant Education Program Russell "Rooster" Valentini Allentown School District Homeless Initiative/Dropout Prevention Sheldon Winnick Bureau of Community and Student Services Student and Safe School Services Pennsylvania Department of Education
6
Alternative Education for Disruptive Youth Programs Statutory Authority: XIX-C (Act 30 of 1997 and Act 48 of 1999) Program The Alternative Education for Disruptive Youth Program was created to assist public school districts (single or in consortiums), intermediate units, area vocationaltechnical schools, charter schools, and special program jointures to provide an alternative setting for the education and counseling of youth who are disruptive in the regular classroom setting due to their ongoing behaviors.
Programs may be provided on the school site, at alternative or private sites, or in county jails, and detention centers.
The educational/counseling services may be contracted with a PDE approved private provider.
The programs can be provided during regular school hours, after hours, or on Saturday.
Activities The minimum requirements of an Alternative Education for Disruptive Youth Program include: A.
The program must be developed in consultation with the faculty, administration staff, the school, parents, and members of the community.
B. Policies must be established that identify those students eligible for placement in the program, comply with the informal hearing procedures set forth in 22 PA Code § 12.8 and placement can only take place after other methods of discipline have been utilized, unless the seriousness of the student's behavior warrants immediate placement.
C.
The instruction must recognize the student's needs and prepare them for successful return to the regular school curriculum d/ li f Student Impact Although the goal of the program is to temporarily remove students from the regular classroom and return them once they have the tools to not be disruptive, students have achieved the following in alternative education settings: · Increased attendance rates.
Improved GPA.
Improved behavior and/or social skills.
Achieved treatment goals.
Received positive employer feedback.
Chapter 4 and Standards NOTE: This instructional program can involve meeting all Chapter 4 academic standards.
Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education ­ Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Assessment: 7
· ·
· ·
and/or completion of graduation requirements.
D.
The instruction must permit the student to make normal academic progress.
E.
The program must operate five (5) days per week.
F.
The program must provide either 20 hours of instruction per week or offer a minimum of 15 hours per week covering at least four of listed curricular areas: language arts, mathematics, science, social studies, health or life skills, and show that normal academic progress may be achieved in fewer hours.
G.
The program must provide a counseling component to help modify the student's behavior.
H. A periodic review of student achievement must take place at least at the end of every semester.
I. School personnel must possess a Level I or Level II Pennsylvania teaching certificate.
· ·
Received high school diploma.
Accepted into postsecondary education.
Pursed career in the military.
Section 4.51 ­ State Assessment System Section 4.52 ­ Local Assessment System Academic Standards for Reading Writing, Speaking and Listening
· · · ·
· · ·
·
Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Pursed career in Section 1.2 ­ Reading vocational field.
Critically in All Content Areas Lowered school Section 1.3 ­ Reading, dropout rates.
Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Allowed for a Section 1.4 ­ Types of less disruptive Writing environment for Section 1.5 ­ Quality of the regular Writing classroom Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and students.
Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics Improve student and Function of the English academics.
Language Section 1.8 - Research Improve student behavior.
Academic Standards for Mathematics Improve parental Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, involvement Number Systems and and Number Relationships communication.
Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Improve Section 2.3 ­ Measurement relationship and Estimation
8
In additional other components are utilized in programs such as: Community service, service learning and work-study, mentoring, peer tutoring, and transitional programs.
·
Programs must take into account the following tasks as they set up their programs:
A.
Conduct a needs assessment and identify target population (grade levels, degree of disruptive behavior, and placement options).
Set policies and procedures for program, including entrance and exit criteria, expectations of students, goals, and objectives.
Include community partnerships, mentors, volunteers, post-secondary education, local businesses and other local agencies.
Create a counseling component for individuals, group, and/or family that
and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Improve all Communication services and Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and coordination of Data Analysis those services to Section 2.7 ­ Probability and each student.
Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus relationship with community businesses and agencies.
Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.1 ­ Unifying Themes Section 3.2 ­ Inquiring and Design Section 3.3 ­ Biological Sciences Section 3.4 ­ Physical Science, Chemistry and Physics Section 3.5 ­ Earth Sciences Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education Section 3.7 ­ Technological Devices Section 3.8 ­ Science, 9
B.
C.
D.
include character education, pro-social skills, personal responsibility, and appropriate conduct.
E. Develop curriculum that meets the core requirements of Act 30 and aligns with Chapter 4 standards, special education compliance, career exploration and training, life skills, and reality based learning, and provides what is necessary for each student to be promoted or meet graduation requirements.
Provide quality trained and certified staff with on-going professional development and evaluation procedures.
Provide parental involvement with ongoing communication, opportunities for participation, progress review meetings, counseling, and community resources.
Maintain a public website that is contributed by schools, private providers, parents, and outside agencies.
Technology and Human Endeavors Academic Standards for Environment and Ecology Section 4.1- Watersheds and Wetlands Section 4.2- Renewable and Nonrenewable Resources Section 4.3- Environmental Health Section 4.4- Agriculture and Society Section 4.5-Integrated Pest Management Section 4.6- Ecosystem and their Interaction Section 4.7- Threatened, Endangered and Extinct Species Section 4.8- Environmental Laws and Regulations Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles of Documents and Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship Section 5.3 ­ How Government Works Section 5.4 ­ How International Relationships Function 10
F.
G.
H.
Functional Behavioral Assessments.
Social Skill Surveys and Assessments.
Attendance Data.
Examples of Student Evaluation Tools: Number of Disciplinary Referrals.
Academic Grades.
Achievement Tests (i.e. Stanford Achievement Test Total Reading and Total Math Score; Woodcock, Key Math, Kaufmann Test of Educational Achievement).
Student Portfolio.
Meeting Individual Goals/Objectives or IEPs.
Academic Standards for Economics Section 6.1 ­ Economic Systems Section 6.2 ­ Markets and Function of Governments Section 6.3 ­ Scarcity and Choice Section 6.4 ­ Economic Interdependence Section 6.5 ­ Work and Earnings Academic Standards for Geography Section 7.1 ­ Basic Geographic Literacy Section 7.2 ­ The Physical Characteristics of Places and Regions Section 7.3 ­ The Human Characteristics of Places and Regions Section 7.4 ­ The Interaction Between People and Places Academic Standards for History Section 8.1 ­ Analysis and Development Section 8.2 ­ History Section 8.3 ­ Historical Skills Pennsylvania United States 11
Program Evaluation:
PDE provides tools and guidance for reporting data on the end-of-year reports, the aggregate, which is sent to the General Assembly.
PDE monitors programs on-site for compliance and effectiveness.
Provides monitoring training sessions for peer monitors and for further guidance.
PDE provides ongoing technical assistance on all areas of the program.
PDE provides a web site just for alternative education, which includes additional links and resources.
The web site can be found on the Internet at: http://www.pde.state.pa.us/alt_ disruptive/site/default.asp.
History Section 8.4 ­ World History Academic Standards for the Arts and Humanities Section 9.1- Production, Performance and Exhibition of Dance, Theatre and Visual Arts Section 9.2-Historical and Cultural Context Section 9.3- Critical Response Section 9.4- Aesthetic Response Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Section 10.4 ­ Physical Activity Section 10.5 ­ Concepts, Principles and Strategies of Movements Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences 12
Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development Academic Standards for World Language Section 12.1Communication in a Target Language Section 12.2Communication in a Classical World Language Section 12.3- The Role of Culture in World Language Acquisition Section 12.4- The Role of Culture in Classical World Language Acquisition Section 12.5- World Language in the Community Section 12.6- Classical World Languages in the Community Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning 13
Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 ­ Entrepreneurship There are enormous amounts of resources to help teachers and administrators provide a comprehensive and valuable program to disruptive youth who need behavior modification and pro social skills in order to achieve success in the regular classroom.
The following are a sampling of research that discuss the benefits of smaller class sizes, more individualized work assistance, counseling to provide tools to deal with emotions and pro social skills, and the need for more parental involvement and connection to the community; all of which are contained in successful alternative education programs.
Additionally, links are provided for more information on successful program models, hands-on classroom behavioral management programs, and model programs.
Applicable Research: Dalton, S. S. (1998) Pedagogy Matters: Standards for effective teaching practice (Research Report No. 4).
Washington, DC and Santa Cruz, CA: Center for Research on Education, Diversity, and Excellence.
This report presents CREDE's five standards for effective pedagogy: joint productive activity, language and literacy development, meaning making, complex thinking, and instructional conversation.
The standards emerge from principles of practice that have proven successful with majority and minority at-risk students in a variety of teaching and learning settings over several decades.
Each standard is accompanied by a set of indicators and illustrated with examples from classrooms.
Dynarski, Mark and Philip Gleason.
What We Have Learned From Evaluations of Federal Dropout-Prevention Programs.
Washington, D. C., June 30, 1998.
This research shows that some programs were effective but there was great diversity in programs and outcomes.
However, results also point to a need to explore more individualized diagnostics and better predictors of who will drop out.
Researchers found that risk factors commonly used by dropout-prevention programs to identify likely dropouts often do not predict accurately which students will drop out, which can undermine program effectiveness.
They also looked at whether school performance and other factors can be used to identify girls at risk of teenage parenthood, noting that frequent absenteeism is the most important predictors.
Funk, Patricia E. Ph.D. and Jon Bailey.
Small Schools, Big Results: Nebraska High School Completion and Postsecondary Enrollment Rates by Size of School District.
NE: Nebraska Alliance for Rural Education, September 1999.
This research document is part of a series of research aimed at strengthening statewide policy supporting rural education and rural community schools.
The 14
research shows that smaller schools promote less dropouts and higher completion rates, and have a 25% higher percent of students going on to postsecondary education.
Kleiner, Brian, Rebecca Porch, Elizabeth Farris, and Westat.
Public Alternative Schools and Programs for Students at Risk of Education Failure.
NCES Washington, D.C., September 2002.
This document provides statistics on alternative education programs across the nation: how they were implemented, if they were off-site, grade levels, entrance and exit criteria, staffing, curriculum, and collaboration services.
Heaviside, Sheila, Casandra Rowand, Catrina Williams, Elizabeth Farris, and Westat Inc.
Violence and Discipline Problems in US Public Schools: 1996-97.
Washington D. C., March 1998.
This research documents some of the causes of school violence and what can be done to help at risk students.
Additional Links: Pennsylvania Department of Education Website: www.pde.state.pa.us Alternative Education for Disruptive Youth Website: http://www.pde.state.pa.us/alt_disruptive/site/default.asp This website contains the applicable laws, guidelines, and applications to submit a program for approval.
The site also has highlighted programs, conferences and workshop information, a list of all programs and contact people, grant information, monitoring schedules, private provider information, and additional resources and links.
Bully Prevention Program 3995 East Market Street York, PA 17402-2773 Telephone: (717) 757-1227 Email: resources@f-cr.com This program was created by Dr. Dan Olweus, University of Bergen, Norway to help bullies, victims, and witnesses to the bullying in school.
The program helps discover and change bullying behavior and surround issues.
Center for Research on the Education of Students Placed At Risk John Hopkins University Center of Social Organization of Schools Telephone: (410) 516-8800 Email: http://www.successforall.net 15
Provides guidance on effective school restructuring.
Center for Research on Education, Diversity, and Excellence Telephone: (831) 459-3500 Email: tharp@cats.ucsc.edu Website: www.crede.ucsc.edu Provides the standards for effective teaching, and products, tools, and research for further assistance.
Center for the Study and Prevention of Violence Blueprints for Violence Prevention University of Colorado Box 442, Building, #10 Boulder, CO 80309-0442 Telephone: (303) 492-8465 Website: http://www.colorado.edu/cspv/blueprints/ The Blueprints Initiative is a comprehensive effort to provide communities with a set of demonstrated effective programs and the technical assistance and monitoring necessary to plan for and develop an effective violence intervention.
The intervention programs identified as the Blueprints meet a strict standard of program effectiveness.
National Center for Education Statistics US Department of Education Office of Educational Research and Improvement Telephone: (202) 502-7326 Website: http://nces.ed.gov NCES is the primary federal site that collects and analyzes educational data for all programs.
The site also contains "fast facts" on elementary and secondary education components across the nation.
Positive Adolescent Choices Training (PACT) Center for Child Adolescent Violence Prevention Wright State University, School of Professional Psychology 9 North Edwin C. Moses Blvd.
Dayton, OH 45407 Telephone: (937) 775-4300 Email: betty.yung@wright.edu Website: http://www.ncef.org/pact.htm The PACT program teaches students techniques to control or appropriately express their anger.
16
Resolving Conflict Creatively Program 40 Exchange Place, Suite 1111 New York, NY 10005 Telephone: (212) 509-0022 Website: http://www.esrnational.org Believes that social responsibility is essential in creating a safe, sustainable, just, democratic world.
Second Step: A Violence Prevention Curriculum Committee for Children 2203 Airport Way South Suite 500 Seattle, WA 98134 Telephone: (800) 634-4449 Website: http://www.cfchildren.org Researches and develops curriculum to prevent bullying and youth violence and to encourage social and emotional intelligence.
The National Center on Addiction and Substance Abuse at Columbia University Website: http://www.casacolumbia.org Discusses and encourages the study and impact of every form of substance abuse that affects our society.
17
Character Education Program Character education is a national movement creating schools that foster ethical, responsible, and caring young people by modeling and teaching good character through emphasis on universal values that we all share.
It is the intentional, proactive effort by schools to instill in students important core traits such as caring, civic virtue and citizenship, justice and fairness, respect, responsibility and trustworthiness.
There are 11 Principles of Effective Character Education according to the Character Education Partnership.
1.
Classrooms discuss and establish a code of ethics.
All curriculum areas consider how civic values, democratic principles, citizenship, rights and responsibilities and character traits can be integrated with academic standards.
2.
Students have a wide range of il i dhl Activities Character education is not an initiative that can be compartmentalized into specific activities; it includes all elements of school life.
It must include attitudes, feelings and behavior.
To support the 11 Principles Elements of Effective Character Education, some possible, activities and initiatives can include the following.
Student Impact Schools and districts may have a wide variety of "programs" that can be considered Character Education including; Service Learning, Communities of Caring, Conflict Resolution, Peer Mediation, Moral Reasoning, Cognitive Development, Social and Emotional Learning, Safe and Drug Free Schools, Ethical Fitness, Moral Education, and others The impact of Character Education programs is determined by the program design.
In general terms Character Education programs have been shown to develop character traits (caring, respect, honest, fairness, responsibility, trustworthiness, etc) in students participating in well designed, integrated Character Education initiatives and in some programs to; · · reduce discipline referrals increase participation in Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education: Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Character Education is a pervasive philosophy of a school and should be present consistently in all classrooms.
It is a base for teaching and learning all academic standards.
Because of the emphasis of Character Education on citizenship the following standards are especially applicable.
18
1.
Character education promotes core ethical values as the basis of good character.
2.
"Character" must be
comprehensively defined to include thinking feeling, and behavior.
service-learning and school opportunities by which they can demonstrate and learn character traits.
Reflection options before, during and after service helps students to explore and integrate character traits into their personal lives.
extracurricular activities · · · · · · · · increase self confidence and self esteem reduce alcohol and drug use promote safer schools with reduced violence reduce bullying behaviors strengthen parent and community involvement improve cooperative work skills develop higher order thinking skills develop multicultural awareness and appreciation · · · · enhance critical thinking skills improve student grades improve attendance increase social skills
Academic Standards for Civics and Government 5.1.
Principles 5.2.
Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship 5.3.
How Government Works
3.
All members of the school community including; staff, teachers, administrators, parents 3.
Effective character and students have opportunities to education requires an continually assess and plan for the intentional, proactive, and comprehensive approach that core values the school-community promotes the core values in all shares and how they are brought to be an integral part of all aspects of phases of school life.
school life 4.
The school must be a caring
community.
4.
Teachers, administrators and students share ideas for what makes a caring school-community and how each can contribute to the positive experience.
This may include class meetings, peer mediation trainings, etc.
A short, clear, mission statement can be developed which clarifies the desired outcomes of character education in the school.
5.
Through literature, history and other curriculum areas, students have opportunities to discuss and learn from the moral actions and dilemmas of historical figures and present day individuals.
To
5.
To develop character, students need opportunities for moral action.
19
6.
Effective character
education includes a meaningful and challenging academic curriculum that respects all learners and helps them succeed.
practice their moral actions service Research has show that young and leadership opportunities are people do far better in encouraged for ALL students.
communities where there are shared moral values.
Research has found that community service programs, especially 6.
Controversial issues in the when combined with reflection academic curriculums are presented from all points of view.
about the moral and personal significance of service to others, Perspectives of different racial, are powerful inducers of religious and ethnic groups are presented.
Students are challenged character development.(1) to use higher level thinking skills, to consider issues and develop strategies to address them.
7.
Students decide how they want to encourage and affirm the display of positive character traits in others.
Students receive consistent messages from all school components that the development of character is important.
8.
School administration supports teachers in their own character development and the integration of character development into teaching practices.
7.
Character education should
strive to develop students' intrinsic motivation.
8.
The school staff must
become a learning and moral community in which all share responsibility for character education and attempt to adhere to the same core values that guide the education of students.
9.
Opportunities for staff/teacher development and support of character initiatives should be available.
Consistent messages
20
9.
Character education
requires moral leadership from both staff and students.
about the importance of character development should be given by administration.
10.
Students conduct community wide assessments to determine the assets and needs of their community and discuss how they can make a difference "with" the community.
Community members work with the students to address needs and strengthen assets.
For positive character development students think about not only their actions and experiences but how their actions and experiences affect others, the community, and the future.
11.
Utilize a wide range of evaluation tools to give all members of the school and the community ways to express their thoughts and feelings about the character development in the schools and whether programs are meeting the mission established for character development..
Use a "community/school barometer" to chart the present and developing character of the school..
10.
The school must recruit
parents and community members as full partners in the character-building effort.
11.
Evaluation of character
education should assess the character of the school, the school staff's functioning as character educators, and the extent to which students manifest good character.
Character Education Resources www.character.org Web site of the Character Education Partnership, the lead agency for character-education programming.
Additional information on the Eleven Principles of Effective Character Education is included.
21
www.center-school.org and www.safeschools.info Information on safe schools and the Communities That Care program.
http://crf-usa.org The Constitutional Rights Foundation seeks to instill in our nation's youth a deeper understanding of citizenship through values expressed in the Constitution and its Bill of Rights, and to educate them to become active and responsible participants in society.
http://polk.ga.net/Westside/Charactered.html Find books for any age on a wide variety of character traits. http://www.goodcharacter.com/table1.html Find classroom teaching guides for all grade levels related to character traits. http://www.goodcharacter.com/Sports.html How coaches, teachers and students can assure that athletics are supportive of character education.
www.actsofkindness.org This site offers great ideas for bringing various character values into the classroom.
Click on the links to receive print copies of their ideas.
Lesson plans and teachers guides available.
Great for service learning needs.
Ethical Fitness Manual A workbook and training program developed by students at Gratz High School in Philadelphia to teacher students to be "ethically fit". http://www.gratzclusterydslc.org/ (1) Bringing in a New Era in Character Education by William Damon, Hoover Institution Press, 2002 For more information: Cynthia Belliveau, Ph.D. Eastern Director Pennsylvania Alliance for Character Education Franklin Building Annex Suite P117 Philadelphia, PA 19104-3325 Phone: (215) 573-6535 Email: belliveau@pobox.upenn.edu www.pitt.edu/~pace Web site of the Pennsylvania Alliance for Character Education 22 Cyndi Wetmiller Western Director Pennsylvania Alliance for Character Education University of Pittsburgh William Pitt Union, Room 920 Pittsburgh, PA 15260 Phone: 412-648-1673 Email: cfish@pitt.edu
Classroom Plus (Pennsylvania's Education Support Services Program) Statutory Authority: Act 4 of 2001 Program Classroom Plus is a State initiative that provides grants of up to $500 to parents of children struggling in reading and math so they can purchase individual or small group instruction at a time other than the regularly scheduled school hours.
Activities Tutoring services are provided in the areas of reading, math and language arts.
Program activities differ from provider to provider, and are offered outside of school hours, in non-traditional settings and through nontraditional methods to reach the young people and families most in need of academic support.
Tutoring services are offered by over 1,700 approved providers located statewide throughout all 67 counties.
Student Impact To aid eligible students in need of improvement and ensure that students can achieve at high levels.
Chapter 4 and Standards Classroom Plus instruction is to be aligned with the Pennsylvania academic standards and the curriculum of the student's local school.
Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education ­ Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.51 ­ State Assessment System Section 4.52 ­ Local Assessment System Academic Standards for Reading Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 Section 1.2 Section 1.3 Literature Section 1.4 Section 1.5 Section 1.6 Section 1.7 English ­ Learning to Read Independently ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting ­ ­ ­ ­ Types of Writing Quality of Writing Speaking and Listening Characteristics and Function of the 23
Children are eligible for Classroom Plus if they are currently enrolled in grades three through six at a school entity and score at the basic level or below-basic level of proficiency on the PSSA in the fifth grade, or in the bottom half on standardized, Department-approved achievements tests in second, third, or fourth grades.
For more information on Cl Pl
Classroom Plus, go to www.state.pa.us, PA Keyword: "tutoring grants" or call the Classroom Plus Hotline at 1-800-219-9740.
Language Section 1.8 - Research Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus
The following resources are examples related to various aspects of tutoring programs such as Classroom Plus.
However, these resources are in no way the only ones available.
Washington's Readiness to Learn Program: Highlights from the 2000-01 Statewide Evaluation The Readiness to Learn (RL) Program links education and other human service providers together to offer after-school and summer programs, tutoring and parenting skills classes.
Results include improvement in academic performance and statistically significant increases in GPA.
"Academic Performance and School Success: Sources and Consequences," 1997, by J. David Hawkins, Issues in Children's and Families Lives, Volume 8 Children who develop a commitment to succeed in school and who feel a sense of attachment to school and to their teachers are more successful academically than other children (Harachi, Abbott, Catalano 
Academic achievement has been affected consistently and positively by one-on-one tutoring of elementary students.
Tutoring by older students, adult community volunteers, trained paraprofessionals and certified teachers has produced substantial long-term improvements in students' achievement in reading and math.
(Wasik 
Tutoring provided by other students has positive effects on both tutors' and tutees' academic achievement and attitudes toward the subject covered across all achievement levels.
(Cohen, Kulik 
Research consistently finds that family involvement has a direct, positive effect on children's achievement and is the most accurate predictor of a student's success in school.
Reading/Writing Programs help low-achieving students recognize that focusing on reading and writing skills is the foundation for effective learning in all other subjects.
When all groups in a community provide collective support to the school, an infrastructure is created that provides a caring, supportive environment where youth can thrive and achieve.
Contact: Dr. Kerri McCarthy, Director Bureau of Performance Accountability and Reporting PA Department of Education 333 Market Street, 9th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-705-2343 Fax: 717-705-0708 Email: kemccarthy@state.pa.us
25
Education Leading to Career Training and Employment Program: Fatherhood Initiative Program The ELECT Fatherhood Initiative (EFI) awards grants to local education agencies to assist custodial and noncustodial fathers become successful, responsible and actively involved parents and selfsufficient adults.
Eligible participants include in school or GED students, under the age of 22, whose personal gross income is under 235% of the Federal Poverty Income Level and who have established paternity or are willing to complete an acknowledgement of paternity form.
Activities Intensive child development Instruction Fathering support group Self-discipline instruction Child health and safety instruction Instruction in anger management and conflict resolution Student Impact Promotes knowledge of child development and growth Provides peer support and learning related to parenting Provide skills to young fathers in sexual responsibility Provide instruction on practices and resources to maintain child health and safety Provide resources and strategies to young fathers in anger management and conflict resolution in relation to child discipline and relationships with the child's mother Provide opportunities for young fathers to observe and practice parenting skills including acting as positive role models for younger fathers Provide tutorial support as needed to promote academic success Provides information and Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Academic Standards for Reading, Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Functions of the English Language Section 1.8 ­ Research Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation 26
Mentoring and role modeling
Intensive literacy instruction/remediation Life skills and family
budgeting Paternity acknowledgement Individual and group supportive services
resources on personal and financial responsibility Assist fathers with filing acknowledgement forms Encourage regular school attendance Provides personal and peer support
Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 - Entrepreneurship 27
Health care and nutritional education
Addresses importance of preand post-natal care Promotes good parenting practices regarding infant care
Child development and parenting
Assist with access to health care and nutrition for mother and child Builds knowledge of parental skills and child development Enhances skills to develop positive parent-child relationships
Vocational and career planning Coordination of community resources Case management services
Provides teens with training and resources on joining labor force Assist students make transition from school to work Promotes self sufficiency
including quarterly home visitation
Assures comprehensive continuum of services Provides individual, comprehensive case management based on academic, health, social and personal needs of students
Attendance and retention
Assist students in accessing all necessary services and support to facilitate regular school attendance Assist students in meeting individual goals and objectives as outlined in the individual service plan Address causes of absenteeism monitor/improve student attendance Reduce dropout rate Promote graduation Encourage academic progress Assess student academic, social and health needs
Student assessment and individualized plan
Creative and flexible programming
Devise service plan to address student's challenges and optimize strengths 28
Provide year round plan for activities and services beyond normal school day and year Develop strategies to address attendance and academic performance jeopardized by absences related to their child's illness, child care, complications related to pregnancy, post-natal recovery Budgeting and family planning Provide information and capacity building on achieving financial self-sufficiency and secondary pregnancy prevention Provide information, referrals and follow-up to domestic violence service agencies and other community resources as needed Collaborate with county assistance office and other community resources to identify and access qualified child care and transportation services Promote academic achievement Provide educational and personal support 29
Relevant information regarding domestic violence and other issues that may affect parenting Access to child care and transportation
Mentoring, tutoring, and homework assistance
Summer services Provide face to face and other case management and academic services during months when school is not in session Homebound instruction Provide homebound instruction to any student whose physical condition prohibits the student from attending school Reduces drop out rates Supports academic success Transition services Develop transition plan regarding student's interests, aptitudes, and abilities for student prior to graduation Promotes self-sufficiency Support services to GED students (optional) Assists students in meeting longrange goals Provide access to educational and support services to GED students Promotes attainment of GED certificate Retrieval services (optional) Identify and enroll pregnant or parenting youth under the age of 22 who have not attained a GED or high school diploma 30
The following list includes a sample of research demonstrating the positive impact that the support and educational services provided by ELECT Fatherhood Program have on academic success.
National Fatherhood Initiative 101 Lake Forest Blvd.
Suite 360 Gaithersburg, MD 20877 www.fatherhood.org Title: Fathering Facts 4th Edition This comprehensive collection and review of statistics and research on the extent and effects of father absence and the effect of the presence of fathers in children's lives proves that fatherhood really matters.
National Practitioners Network for Fathers and Families, Inc. 1003 K Street, NW Suite 565 Washington, DC 20001 (202)737-6680 www.npnff.org Title: Fragile Families Research Brief; Father Involvement, Maternal Health Behavior and Infant Health This brief examines greater father involvement and the positive effect on the mother and child, specifically looking at mother's prenatal health behavior and infant health.
It examines father involvement during the pregnancy and around the time of birth and how it is associated with more positive health behaviors on the part of mothers and with better birth outcomes for infants.
National Fatherhood Project Families and Work Institute 267 Fifth Ave.
Floor 2 New York, New York 10016 (212)465-2044 www.fatherhoodproject.org Title: New Expectations: Community Strategies for Responsible Fatherhood This latest release from the Fatherhood Project promotes a new way of thinking and acting to promote responsible fatherhood, including a jargon-free review of research, state of the art review of community-based strategies, tips from leading practitioners.
31
Education Leading to Career Training and Employment Program: Fatherhood Initiative
Contacts: Dorothy Hershey ELECT State Coordinator PA Department of Education 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-7089 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: dhershey@state.pa.us Shileste Overton Morris Youth Development Manager Center for Schools 
32
Education Leading to Career Training and Employment Program Program The ELECT program awards grants to local education agencies to assist expectant and parenting teens to break the cycle of welfare dependence by remaining in school, maintaining regular attendance, obtaining a high school diploma or GED certificate, and securing post-graduate employment, education or training that will help them become successful parents and self-sufficient adults.
Eligible participants include in-school or GED students who are under the age of 22 and fit into one of the following categories: I) expectant or custodial parent receiving TANF benefits; II) expectant or parenting teen receiving Food Stamps benefits; or III) expectant or parenting teens whose personal gross income is under 235% of the Federal Poverty Income Level Activities Individual and group supportive services Student Impact Encourages regular school attendance Provides personal and peer support Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Academic Standards for Reading, Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Functions of the English Language Section 1.8 ­ Research Academic Standards for 33
Health care and nutritional education
Addresses importance of preand post-natal care Promotes good parenting practices regarding infant care Assists with access to health care and nutrition for mother and child
Child development and parenting
Builds knowledge of parenting skills and child development Enhances skills to develop positive parent-child relationships
Vocational and career Provides teens with training and resources on joining labor planning force Assist students make a
transition from school to work Promotes self sufficiency Coordination of community resources Case management services including quarterly home visitation Assures comprehensive continuum of services Provides individual, comprehensive case management based on academic, health, social and personal needs of students Assists student in accessing all necessary services and support to facilitate regular school attendance Assists student in meeting individual goals and objectives as outlined in student's individual service plan Attendance and retention Address causes of absenteeism Monitor/improve student attendance Reduce dropout rate Promote graduation Student assessment and individualized
Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development 34
Encourage academic progress
plan Assess student academic, personal, social, health needs Creative and flexible programming Devise service plan to address student's challenges and optimize strengths Provide year round plan for activities and services beyond normal school day and year Develop strategies to address attendance and academic performance jeopardized by absences related to their child's illness, child care, complications related to pregnancy, post-natal recovery Budgeting and family planning Provide information and capacity building on achieving financial self-sufficiency and secondary pregnancy prevention Provide information, referrals and follow-up to domestic violence service agencies and other community resources as needed Collaborate with county assistance office and other community resources to 35 Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 - Entrepreneurship
Relevant information regarding domestic violence and other issues that may affect parenting Access to child care and transportation
identify and access qualified child care and transportation services Mentoring, tutoring, and homework assistance Promote academic achievement Provide educational and personal support Summer services Provide face to face and other case management and academic services during months when school is not in session Provide homebound instruction to any student whose physical condition prohibits the student from attending school Reduces drop out rates Supports academic success Transition services Develop transition plan regarding student's interests, aptitudes, and abilities for student prior to graduation Promotes self-sufficiency Support services to GED students (optional) Assists students in meeting long-range goals Provide access to educational 36
Homebound instruction
and support services to GED students Retrieval services (optional) Promotes attainment of GED certificate Identify and enroll pregnant or parenting youth under the age of 22 who have not attained a GED or high school diploma Provides one-time allowances Eye glasses and hearing aid allowance to cover the costs of eye glass and hearing devices for students without medical insurance The following list includes a sample of research demonstrating the positive impact that the support and educational services provided by ELECT Programs have on academic success.
Adolescent and Family Health The Institute for Youth Development P.O. Box 16560 Washington, D.C 20041 www.afhjournal.org Title: Reducing the Risk: Connections That Make a Difference in the Lives of Youth This report explains finding on: measuring health and behaviors; family connections; school connections, individual characteristics; and conclusions.
The publication provides a comprehensive overview of the Add Health findings, as well as information on the study design and data set.
Robin Hood Foundation Catalyst Institute 111 Broadway, 19th Floor New York, New York 10006 (212) 227-6601 http://www.robinhood.org/home/home.cfm 37
Title: Kids Having Kids, A Robin Hood Foundation Special Report on the Costs of Adolescent Childbearing This report presents the findings of a research project to further our understanding of the consequences of adolescent childbearing for adolescent mothers, for their children, for the fathers of their children, and for the nation.
National Dropout Prevention Center Clemson University 209 Martin Street Clemson, SC 29631-1555 (864) 656-2599 Email: ndpc@clemson.edu The mission of the National Dropout Prevention Center is to serve as a research center and resource network for practitioners, researchers and policymakers to reshape school and community environments to meet the needs of youth in at-risk situations so these students receive the quality education and services necessary to succeed academically and graduate from high school.
Contact: Shileste Overton Morris Youth Development Program Manager Center for Schools 
38
Education Mentoring Statutory Authority: Pennsylvania Act 49 of 1987 Program Education Mentoring is a program, which provides funding to community-based organizations to develop and expand mentoring opportunities for school-age children, in collaboration with school districts, to increase school attendance and to promote academic achievement.
Activities One-on-one mentoring/relationship development Homework help to focus on academic areas such as reading, writing, math, technology Tutoring/focus on school projects Dedicated time for mentee/mentor pair Opportunity for group activities 
Opportunity for involvement by community Increases connectedness members such as police, firefighters, lawyers, other
community organizations, etc.
Specialized training for mentors, mentees and parents/families
Provides window to community Improves school/community cooperation Increases school/community collaboration Improves school to community transition Can decrease teen pregnancy and improve teen parenting skills Can decrease delinquent behaviors/disciplinary referrals Can promote youth leadership Can increase parental/family involvement
Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationship Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education Section 3.7 ­ Technological Devices Academic Standards for Environment and Ecology Section 4.2 ­ Renewable and Nonrenewable Resources Section 4.3 ­ Environmental Health Section 4.6 ­ Ecosystems and their Interactions Section 4.8 ­ Humans and the Environment Section 4.9 ­ Environmental Laws and Regulations Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles and Documents of Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizens Academic Standards for Economics Section 6.5 ­ Work and Earnings Academic Standards for Geography Section 7.3 ­ The Human Characteristics of Places and Regions 40
Academic Standards for History Section 8.1 ­ Historical Analysis and Skills Development Section 8.2 ­ Pennsylvania History Section 8.3 ­ United States History Section 8.4 ­ World History Academic Standards for Arts and Humanities Section 9.1 ­ Production, Performance and Exhibition of Dance, Music, Theatre and Visual Arts Section 9.2 ­ Historical and Cultural Contexts Academic Standards for World Languages Section 12.1 ­ Communication in a Target Language Section 12.3 ­ The Role of Culture in World Language Acquisition Section 12.5 ­ World Languages in the Community Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 - Entrepreneurship Related literature/documentation: Washington's Readiness to Learn Program: Highlights from the 2000-01 Statewide Evaluation The primary purpose of the Readiness to Learn (RTL) Program is to link education and other human service providers together in an effort to ensure that all children are able to start the school day ready to learn.
RTL programs provided services such as after-school and summer programs, tutoring and parenting skills classes.
Evidence of increased success in school included: · Elementary school teachers reported improvement in the academic performance of 51% of students referred for academic problems.
· Middle and high school students referred for academic problems showed a small but statistically significant increase in GPA.
· Elementary school teachers reported significantly fewer attendance problems for students referred for attendance problems.
41
· · ·
Actual attendance data for attendance referrals in all grade levels showed that 53% of the students improved their attendance.
Elementary school teachers rated a significant improvement in behavior among students who had been referred for behavior problems.
Students referred for behavior problems and who had at least one referral or detention at baseline received significantly fewer office referrals or detentions.
Executive Summary - Closing the Achievement Gap: Using the Environment as an Integrating Context for Learning, Gerald Lieberman, Ph.D., and Linda Hoody, State Education and Environment Roundtable As students work together, mentor their peers and younger students... they have the opportunity to develop interpersonal skills that will serve them throughout their lives.
(p. 9) National Dropout Prevention Center website The Center has "identified 15 effective strategies that have the most positive impact on the dropout rate."
Below are those strategies which relate to the Education Mentoring Initiative.
Early interventions: · Family Involvement: Research consistently finds that family involvement has a direct, positive effect on children's achievement and is the most accurate predictor of a student's success in school · Reading/Writing Programs: Early interventions to help low-achieving students recognize that focusing on reading and writing skills is the foundation for effective learning in all other subjects.
Basic Core Strategies: · Mentoring/Tutoring: Mentoring is a one-to-one caring, supportive relationship between a mentor and a mentee that is based on trust.
· Out of school experiences: Since learning happens all day long, 365 days a year, many schools are providing after-school and summer enhancement programs designed to eliminate information loss, inspire interest in a variety of areas, and expand the knowledge base.
Making the Most of the Wider School Community: · Community Collaboration: When all groups in a community provide collective support to the school, an infrastructure is created that provides a caring supportive environment where youth can thrive and achieve.
42
"Solving High School Attendance Problems: A Case Study, M. Wagstaff, L. Combs 
(p. 21) Exploring the Social Contexts Influencing Student Success of Failure: Introduction, R. Van Acker 
"Academic Performance and School Success: Sources and Consequences," 1997, by J. David Hawkins, Issues in Children's and Families Lives, Volume 8 Children who develop a commitment to succeed in school and who feel a sense of attachment to school and to their teachers are more successful academically than other children (Harachi, Abbott, Catalano 
As a result of opportunities and reinforcements experienced in social groups that model, condone, or approve of these behaviors, individuals may be encouraged to engage in such behaviors (Bourgois, 1995). (p. 285) Academic achievement has been affected consistently and positively by one-on-one tutoring of elementary students.
Tutoring by older students, adult community volunteers, trained paraprofessionals, and certified teachers has produced substantial long-term improvements in students' achievement in reading and math.
(Wasik 
Tutoring provided by other students has positive effects on both tutors' and tutees' academic achievement and attitudes toward the subject covered across all achievement levels.
(Cohen, Kulik 
There is some evidence that the teaching of social and emotional skills in schools also can have long-term effects on academic achievement (Elias, Gara, Schuyler, Brandon-Muller 
(p. 300) Strategies and Successes in School Dropout Prevention: A Forum Brief, from the American Youth Policy Forum, 1995 Some student behaviors are more likely precursors of dropping out of school than others.
For example, there is a strong correlation between repeated school tardiness and absenteeism and dropping out, while participation in extra-curricular activities tends to lead to staying in school because it provides students with another "hook" if they reject the academic side of school.
Low basic skills, being over-age for one's grade, social isolation, frequent moves to different schools, deficient support systems, siblings who have dropped out, and low socio-economic levels also correlate with a potential to leave school early.
Policy decisions can have important effects on the incidence of dropping out.
Dr. Smink indicated several widely used policies that directly result in young people dropping out of school.
These include: out-of-school suspensions; graduation requirements; no opportunities to make up work; no summer school; automatic failure if more than ten days are missed; grade retention.
Some policies may need to be changed; others are based on real needs and could be adapted to prevent dropping out.
For example, students could receive in-school suspension or have strict requirements to keep up with work while out of school.
In another example, summer, alternative or Saturday school could be used to make up work to avoid the necessity to retain students in the same grade.
The National Dropout Prevention Center uses the following techniques to address the needs of youth at-risk of dropping out of school: school restructuring, prevention, mediation, intervention and recovery...
The National Dropout Prevention Center considers the following criteria important for the success of dropout prevention programs: ...
Mentoring ­ a relative inexpensive strategy, since it involved volunteers, which reaps substantial rewards in part because it convinces students that someone really cares about whether they complete school or not and really cares about them....
School-based Mentoring: Studies Find BBBS School-based Mentoring Highly Effective, Third Edition, Big Brothers Big Sisters of America According · 64 · 58 · 60 to teachers, who referred all of the students in the Big Brothers Big Sisters School-Based Mentoring Study: percent of students developed more positive attitudes toward school.
percent achieved higher grades in social studies, languages and math. percent improved relationships with adults, and 56 percent improved relationships with peers.
44
· 55 percent were better able to express their feelings.
· 64 percent developed higher levels of self-confidence.
· 62 percent were more likely to trust their teachers...
They (students) were also less likely than their peers to repeat a grade, and their average number of unexcused absences also dropped.
Big Brothers Big Sisters School-Based Mentoring: Evaluation Summary of Five Pilot Programs, Big Brothers Big Sisters of America, December 1999 Unexcused absences and being previously retained are two factors that significantly increase the likelihood that a youth will drop out of high school.
Since mentoring is shown to decrease unexcused absences and retainment, it is reasonable to assume that mentored youth will be less likely to drop out of high school.
For the 2002-2003 school year, the Pennsylvania Department of Education is providing grant funds to 44 community-based organizations implementing mentoring programs across the Commonwealth.
For further information about these programs or about the Education Mentoring Initiative, contact: Shirley Gould, Grant Manager PA Department of Education Bureau of Community and Student Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-4605 www.pde.state.pa.us (Go to Student Services) Lynda Long, Education Mentoring/Dropout Center for Schools and Communities 1300 Market Street, Suite 12 Lemoyne, PA 17043 Voice: 717-763-1661 www.center-school.org
45
The Pennsylvania Homeless Children's Initiative Federal Authority: McKinney- Vento Reauthorization XIX-C (Act 30) Program The Pennsylvania Homeless Children's Initiative was developed to ensure that homeless children and youth have access to the same free, appropriate public education as other children and youth.
The primary goal of the Pennsylvania Homeless Children's Initiative is to identify and eliminate barriers to the enrollment, attendance, and success of homeless children and youth in school.
Activities Raising community awareness as to the phenomenon of homeless children through presentations, workshops, brochures, posters, videos, etc.
Identification of homeless children and youth as defined by McKinney-Vento including doubled-up homeless Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards Awareness raising promotes and Assessment identification of homeless General Provisions: students, and once identified, they Section 4.2 ­ Purpose can become connected to services Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Decreases feelings of isolation of Curriculum and Instruction: homeless students, decreases Section 4.21 ­ Elementary absenteeism, increases Education: Primary and opportunities to attend school in a Intermediate Levels timely manner Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Increases attendance, decreases Education absenteeism, allows for continuity Vocational-Technical Education: in remaining in original school, Section 4.31 ­ Vocationaldecreases stigma of homelessness Technical Education Student Impact
Maintain school of origin when in best interest of child and facilitate with students' transfer to new school
46
Expedite enrollment through removal of identified barriers (i.e. school records, school supplies, unpaid fees, immunizations, etc.)
Formation of and collaboration with local task forces/ homeless coalitions Visiting homeless shelters, homeless program sites, and doubled-up homeless families
Students enrolled without unwarranted delay, decrease in drop out rates
Increases school-community collaboration Understanding the circumstances where homeless children live, play, and study
Educating shelter staff in rights Regular school attendance promoted.
Provide a link between of homeless children and shelter, school, and homeless procedures and processes to families follow Raising school personnel's awareness through in-services, workshops, and presentations as to the identification of and the education of homeless students
Academic Standards for Reading, Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 k- Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function of the English Language Section 1.8 ­ Research
Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationship Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Increases knowledge of legal requirements of the law, increases Estimation school-community collaboration, Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation provides a link between shelter Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical and school, school personnel Reasoning and Connections more sensitive to needs of Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical homeless children and youth Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry 47
Distribution of new changes in McKinney-Vento/ No Child Left Behind to school personnel, shelters, and community agencies Providing for basic needs of homeless students (i.e. school uniforms, school supplies, emergency transportation, school fees hygiene supplies, book bags, clothing) After school programs, tutoring
Knowledge of new laws permits homeless students to be enrolled without delay
Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus
Academic Standards for Science and Technology Increases attendance, children can Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education participate fully in school Section 3.7 ­ Technological programs, reduces delay in enrollment, children attend "ready Devices Section 3.8 ­ Science, Technology to learn" and Human Endeavors Improve grades, reduces behavioral problems through projects designed to bolster self esteem, build resiliency through completion of projects Students experience educational/cultural activities to share with regular students, quality of life is improved Parents' knowledge assists in increased attendance, improved grades Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles and Documents of Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities Section 5.3 ­ How Government Works Section 5.4 ­ How International Relationships Function Academic Standards for Economics Section 6.1 ­ Economic Systems Section 6.2 ­ Markets and the Functions of Governments Section 6.3 ­ Scarcity and Choice Section 6.4 ­ Economic Interdependence Section 6.5 ­ Work and Earnings Academic Standards for Geography Section 7.1 ­ Basic Geographic Literacy 48
Summer enrichment programs
Parent education: Raise awareness of parents to legal rights and their responsibilities to their children to receive a free, appropriate public education
Information about attendance and discipline policies are distributed to parents, shelter providers, and related agencies Parenting enrichment programs
Decrease in absenteeism, truancy, decrease in conduct violations, parent involvement increased
Increasing parent involvement, parents feel empowered to act with confidence as their child's first teacher
Section 7.2 ­ the Physical characteristics of Places and Regions Sections 7.3 ­ The Human Characteristics of Places and Regions Section 7.4 ­ The Interactions Between People and Places Academic Standards for History Section 8.1 ­ Historical Analysis and Skills Development Section 8.2 ­ Pennsylvania History Section 8.3 ­ United States History Section 8.4 ­ World History Academic Standards for Arts and Humanities Section 9.1 ­ Production, Performance and Exhibition of Dance, Music, Theatre and Visual Arts Section 9.2 ­ Historical and Cultural Contexts Section 9.3 ­ Critical Response Section 9.4 ­ Aesthetic Response Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention
Coordination of existing services (i.e. early childhood programs, special ed. services, gifted and talented services, vocational education, Head Start, Even Start, Alternative Education
Improve grades, fuels participation in needed available services, increases parental involvement
Facilitate programs/ activities that are designed to encourage pro-social behaviors i.e. ("Bully-proofing") Safe Havens, etc.
Enhance a safer learning environment, decrease suspensions/expulsions, students learn "how to fight" fairly by attacking the problem not the person, students learn to use "words" not actions to solve problems
49
Conflict/ resolution in after school programs and on site shelter programs
Students learn how to prevent disruptions to learning, reduction in school violence, help students assisted with anger management Decrease absenteeism, when the need arises, temporary transportation is provided to the students to prevent delays in school attendance and to attend special events Increase attendance rates, improve grades, bolster selfesteem, increase schoolcommunity collaboration
Section 10.4 ­ Physical Activity Section 10.5 ­ Concepts, Principles and Strategies of Movement Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 - Entrepreneurship
Student transportation in specific circumstances
Attendance award programs at shelters to promote regular school attendance
Assist with GED completion and vocational exploration Distribution of attendance guidelines to parents, shelter providers, and other agencies
Students can move forward to post-secondary education or work
Increase attendance, decrease dropout rate, decrease truancy rate, increase parent involvement, decrease suspensions/ expulsions
50
Provide information at legal proceedings Facilitate in dispute resolution when conflicts arise
Decrease dropout rates, increase parent involvement Facilitate in dispute resolution, decrease academic failure, increase parent involvement, increase attendance when disputes concerning enrollment/ placement are resolved in a timely manner School readiness: Children prepared for kindergarten experience, lives of homeless preschoolers enriched through age-appropriate activities designed to help children think, develop socially, emotionally, and physically, parents participate in extended learning activities
Preschool enrichment programs
51
The Pennsylvania Department of Education established the Office of the State Coordinator for the Education of Homeless and Youth in 1988 following the signing of the Stewart B. McKinney Homeless Act in 1987.
Fourteen local sites have been established with local coordinators at each site to assist homeless children and youth receive educational and other appropriate services.
SITE LOCATIONS Allegheny IU #3 Gail Arden Odoricich, Site Coordinator odorcich@aiu3.net Bucks County IU #22 Thomas M. Norlen, Site Coordinator tnorlen@bciu.k12.pa Lancaster School Disctrict Kenneth B. Marzinko, Site Coordinator KEN@lancaster.k12.pa Allentown School District Russell A. Valentini, Site Coordinator valentinir@allentownsd.org Central IU #10 Lauren Haag, Site Coordinator lbh@penn.com Arin IU #28 Maria R. McCarthy, Site Coordinator mmccarthy@arinl.k12.pa.us Erie School District Danny Jones, Site Coordinator 02KUUL@aol.com Berks County IU #14 Eileen Winterbottom, Site Coordinator eilwin@berksiu.org Harrisburg School District Eugenia Smith, Site Coordinator eugsmith@hbgsd.k12.pa
Luzerne IU #18 Marianne Argenio, Site Coordinator margenio@liu18.org
School District of Philadelphia Dorette Ham dligonsham@phila.k12.pa.us
York City School District Sonia Pitzi, Site Coordinator slp@ycs.k12.pa.us
Montgomery County IU #23 Midwestern IU #4 Betty "B.J." Fediaczko, Site Jane M. Pigott Coordinator (Butler County) jpigott@mciu.org Susan Pfahles, Site Coordinator (Lawrence County) walmosped@www.pathway.org Mary Jo Kelley, Site Coordinator (Mercer County) PA Department of Education Sheldon Winnick swinnick@state.pa.us
52
Research: · "Report to Congress Fiscal Year 2000" published by the United States Department of Education, Office of Elementary and Secondary Education.
Education for Homeless Children and Youth Program.
Title VII, Subtitle B of the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act.
www.serve.org/nche · "Early Childhood Poverty: A Statistical Profile (March 2002)" published by National Center for Children in Poverty.
http://cpmcnet.columbia.edu/dept/nccp/ecp302.html · "Homelessness: Programs and the People They Serve Summary Report" by M. Burt, L. Aron, T. Dougles, J. Valente, E. Lee, and B. Iwen. http://www.huduser.org/publications/homeless/homelessness/contents.html · "National Survey of Homeless Assistance Providers and Clients (NSHAPC)" published by Interagency Council on the Homeless. http://www.huduser.org/publications/povsoc.html · "Homeless in America, Unabated and Increasing: A 10-Year Perspective" published by National Coalition for the Homeless. http://www.nationalhomeless.org/10yearsec.html · "Trends in the Well-Being of America's Children and Youth" published by the Office of the Assistant Secretary for Planning and Evaluation, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.
http://aspe.hhs.gov/hsp/01trends/ · "Childstats.gov" published by the Federal Interagency Forum on Child and Family Statistics.
http://childstats.gov · "Annie E. Casey Foundation."
Provides access to the annual KIDSCOUNT Data book- an online database that allows generation of custom graphs, maps, ranked lists and state- by- state profiles. http://www.aecf.org/kidscount/kc2002 · "Child Trends."
Database containing the latest national trends and research on over 70 key indicators of child and youth well being, with new indicators added each month.
http://www.childtrendsdatabank.org · "Homeless in a Small Southern City" by L. Mooney and K. Ousley.
A study which strives to fill in the gap in homes literature by collecting data on the homeless in a non-urban location and comparing the results to representative urban and rural samples.
http://www.sociology.org/content/vol005.002/home99.html · "Social Policy Report: Homelessness- Implications for Children and Youth" published by the Society for Research in Child Development.
(Winter 1988) · "Educating Homeless Children and Youth: Problems and Solutions" prepared by the Office for the Education of Homeless Children and Youth, Iowa Department of Education.
· "Pre-school Programs for Homeless Children" by Tina Johnson, Program Specialist, National Center for Homeless Education at SERVE.
Ideas for fostering language development and early literacy skills in children in homeless families.
www.serve.org/nche · "Nowhere to Grow: Homeless and Runaway Adolescents and Their Families" by Les B. Whitbeck and Dan R. Hoyte.
This book represents a personalized study of over 600 runaway adolescents in four states in the Midwest emphasizing survival strategies and risks of premature independence.
· "Meeting the Educational Needs of Homeless Children" by Yvonne Rafferty.
Educational Leadership, December 1997January 1998.
Educators play a critical role in a child's ability to succeed in school.
53
· · · · · ·
· · · · · ·
"Making the Grade: Successes and Challenges in Providing Educational Opportunities to Homeless Children and Youth" published by The National Association for the Education of Homeless Children and Youth and The National Coalition for the Homeless.
(September 1999) Report data collected from 471 local programs.
"Schools Grapple with High Student Mobility Rates" by Del Stover, published in School Board News no. 11 (2000).
Research has shown that students who switch schools frequently fare poorly on standardized test scores.
"Moving Targets" by Linda Jacobson, published in Education Week 32 (2001).
With growing demands to hold schools and teachers more accountable for student performance, researchers and educators say they need to address the problems associated with student mobility has never been greater.
"Education Report of Rule 706 Expert Panel" by Dr. Joy Rogers of the Loyola University Department of Education presented in B.H. v. Johnson, 715 F. Supp. 1387 (N.D. Ill. 1989), 1991.
Lack of continuity is widely recognized within the field of education as jeopardizing any child's school success.
"A Classroom Perspective on Student Mobility" by Andrea Lash and Sandra Kirkpatrick, published in The Elementary School Journal 177 (1990).
Educators have recognized that certain relocations that occur during the academic year can disrupt schooling and the education of the children who move.
"Equalizing Education Resources on Behalf of Disadvantaged Children" by Richard Rothstein, published in A Notion at Risk: Preserving Public Education as an Engine for Social Mobility (2000).
A long history of research showing the deleterious effects of excessive student mobility on achievement drives policymakers to consider how schools can accommodate special needs.
"A Study of Student Mobility in Texas Public Schools" published Texas Education Agency.
Academic performance of mobile students is worse that that of stable students.
"Head Start Children: School Mobility and Achievement in the Early Grades" by Panayota Mantzicopoulos and Dana Knutson, published in Journal of Educational Research (2000).
Frequent moves into different schools or places of residence bring about ecological transitions that place numerous adjustment demands on young children and their families.
"Student Mobility" by Russell Rumberger.
The Informed Educator Series, published by Educational Research Service (2001).
Frequent school changes are associated with a host of problems, including but not limited to nutrition and health problems, below-grade level reading scores, and grade retention.
"Student Stability Vs. Mobility" by Thomas Fowler-Finn, published in The School Administrator (August 2001).
Those schools that create a climate of caring and a sense of belonging for all students will be in the best position to provide effective instruction in the coming decade.
"Pervasive Student Mobility: A Moving Target for School Improvement" by David Kerbow, published in Study of the Chicago Panel on School Policy and the Center for School Improvement at the University of Chicago.
(1996) Mobile students tend to be of lower socio-economic status and often begin school less prepared for learning.
"Kids, Schools Suffer from Revolving Door" by Debra Williams, published in Catalyst: Voices of Chicago School Reform (April 1996) For many transfer students, mobility is a vicious cycle.
54
· · · · · · · · · · · · · · ·
"Student Mobility and the Increased Risk of High School Dropout" by Russell Rumberger and Katherine Larson, published in American Journal of Education (1998) One of the nation's six national education goals is to increase high school completion and reduce the gap between minority and white youth.
"School Mobility and Student Achievement in an Urban Setting" by Lisa Melman Heinlein and Marybeth Shinn, published in Psychology in the Schools (2000).
The data from the study shows that mobility was related to lower achievement when no controls for prior achievement were used.
"The Educational Consequences of Mobility for California Students and Schools" published by Policy Analysis for California Education in PACE Policy Brief (May 1999).
Students tend to suffer psychologically, socially, and academically from mobility.
"A Report from the Kids Mobility Project" by Virginia Craig, Kids Mobility Project (1998).
Researchers found that students who moved often had lower attendance rates and that attendance levels were important to achievement.
"Helping Homeless Students Build Resilience: What the School Community Can Do" by Evelyn Reed-Victor and Lynn Pelco, published in Journal for a Just and Caring Education (1999).
Fostering Successful school participation is fundamental to improving adult outcomes for homeless children and youth.
"Impact of Family Relocation on Children's Growth, Development, School Function, and Behavior" by David Wood, MD MPH, published in Journal of the American Medical Association (1993).
Study found that frequent family relocation is associated with an increased risk of failing grades and frequently occurring behavioral problems.
"...being without a home should not mean being without an education..."
Comments of Congresswoman Judy Biggert as published in 147 Cong Rec H 2396, 2404 (May 22, 2001). "...H.R. 1 strengthens the McKinney program...This bill ensures that a homeless child is immediately enrolled in school..."
Comments of Congresswoman Judy Biggert as published in 147 Cong Rec H 2396, 2404 (May 22, 2001).
" This bill contains provisions intended to avoid disruption of a child's education program by maintaining the child's attendance at his or her school of origin."
Published in 107 S. Rpt. 7.
" A child who becomes homeless is to be served in the school of origin for the duration of the child's homelessness..."
Published in 107 S. Rpt. 7.
National Association for the Education of Homeless Children and Youth (NAEHCY) www.naehcy.org National Center for Homeless Education (NCHE) www.serve.org/nche National Coalition for the Homeless (NCH) www.nationalhomeless.org National Law Center for Homelessness and Poverty (NLCHP) www.nlchp.org National Network for Youth (NN4Y) http://www.nn4youth.org/my/shared/home.jsp
55
Instructional Support Team Statutory Authority: Program Instructional Support Team Pittsburgh, PA Activities I.S.T. has been in existence since 1990.
The I.S.T. process begins with a request for assistance.
The request may be due to poor attendance, poor test scores, inappropriate behavior, and/or life stressors that interfere with learning.
Requestors can be parents and/or teachers.
Student Impact Improve social, academic skills Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education: Primary and Intermediate Assessment: Section 4.51 ­ State Assessment System Section 4.52 ­ Local State Assessment
Identifies the learning needs of students who are experiencing difficulty and providing them with the type of academic, behavioral and/or social support needed to succeed in school.
The intent of I.S.T. is to provide a seamless system where no student suffers from lack of support.
This program fosters the development of collaborative school-based structures where team building, shared expertise and teacherparent partnerships occur for the betterment of students, teachers, parents and schools.
The I.S.T. team consists of core teachers (they carry out the educational strategies), developmental advisor, nurse, speech therapist, parents and principal.
The team develops intervention strategies after testing observing and interviewing parents, students and teachers.
The tests are administered one on one.
All tests are reflective of the current curriculum and standards.
After determining problem areas, tti f ill b
Improve learning environment by looking to understand the student needs.
Then to collectively develop strategies that will Academic Standards for Reading, develop success...
Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing 56
strategies for success will be developed by the team and implemented for 30 days.
In some cases, strategy groups will be designed to work with small groups experiencing the same problems.
The team reconvenes after 30 days to monitor.
A decision is then made to fade, change emphasis.
After 60 days, decisions are made for maintenance or refer for special testing.
Section 1.6 Writing Section 1.7 Function of Section 1.8
­ Speaking and ­ Characteristics and the English Language ­ Research
Criterion for Referrals: Academics Grades K-5 ½ semester or more behind grade level...
Gross motor deficiency...
Frustration level attained during course 60% or more...
Lack of mastery in basic skills that hinder growth of current grade level.
Behavior Grades K-5 Classroom disruption more than 50% in a day...
Inappropriate physical contact with students and/or adults...
Frequent verbal outburst...
Verbal debasement of d d/ dl
Improve the quality of life.
Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationship Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education 57
Improve social and academic impediments
students and/or adults...
Passively resisting...
Elementary Assistance also involves comprehensive services to students and families based on developmental needs and data collected from parents and school staff for the attention of the developmental advisor.
Monitor students who were tested but not eligible for Learning Support or Emotional Support.
Parents are provided with a Homework Survival Kit.
The Kit includes: Homework Tips On · Organization · Oral Reading Development · Reading for Comprehension · Spelling Skills · Math Strategies · Homework Aid Checklist
Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibilities Section 11.4 ­ Child Development
Provide an educational bridge between home and school...
58
IST/Elementary Special Education- Placement Data- Pittsburgh Public Schools- 2000-01 · · · · · · · 543 students were placed in special education in mildly disabled categories (MR, LD, ED) from 59 elementary schools during the 00-01 school year.
This represents a 2.8% referral rate.
This can be compared to 518 students place during the 99-00 school year at a 2.6% referral rate.
65 or 12% of the students placed form 59 elementary schools were identified as Mildly Mentally Retarded.
This is a decrease from 16% to 12% from the 99-01 school year.
This year, 32 students or 49% of the students identified as MR were African American males.
Last year, 48% of students identified as MR were African American males.
348 Students or 64% of the students placed from 59 elementary schools were identified as Learning Disabled.
This reflects an increase from 59% to 64%.
This year, 168 students or 48% of the students identified as LD were African American males.
During the 99-01 school year, 115 students or 37% of students identified as LD were African American males.
130 students or 24% of the students placed from 59 elementary schools were identified as Seriously Emotionally Disturbed.
89 students or 68% of these students were African American males.
During the 99-01 school year, 130 or 65% students identified as Seriously Emotionally Disturbed were African American males.
396 student or 73% of students identified for mildly disabled categories of special education were African American.
During the 99-01 school year, 343 or 67% of the students identified for mildly disabled categories of special education were African American.
378 students or 69 % of students identified for mildly disabled categories of special education were male.
(As compared to 68% during the 00-01 school year) During the 00-01 school year, 55% or 301 students identified for mild disabled categories of special education were served by the IST process.
During the 99-00 school year, 55% or 287 of the 518 students identified for mildly disabled categories of special education were served by the IST process.
During the 98-99 school year, 28% of the students identified for mildly disabled categories of special education were served by the IST process.
3,179 elementary students in total were served by the IST process in 59 elementary schools.
91% or 2,882 of the students who were served by the IST process remained in regular education during the current year.
· ·
Contact: Barbara McCloy 110 Urick Lane Monroeville, PA 15146 Work: (412) 338-3830 Home: (412) 372-6739 Email: delicatehue@aol.com
59
Migrant Education Statutory Authority: NCLB, Title I, Part C ­ Education of Migratory Children Program To assist local school districts in improving and coordinating the educational continuity for the nation's migratory children who have had their schooling interrupted.
The program helps migratory children to meet challenging academic standards and graduate from high school with an education that prepares them for responsible citizenship, further learning and productive employment by coordinating and supporting services that sustain and accelerate their growth.
Activities Summer School Teach Basic Language And Math Skills Prepare Children For Standardized Testing Summer School Teach Basic Language And Math Skills Prepare Children For Standardized Testing Home Based Tutorial Programs Teach Basic Language And Math Skills Prepare For Standardized Testing Develop English Language Skills In Whole Family Encourage Family Connections With School and Community Help Children With Homework (Winter Term) Student Leadership Institute/Emancipated Student Impact Increase English Proficiency Encourage increase in Parental Participation and involvement Drop Out Prevention Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education: Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Section 4.26 ­ ESOL Academic Standards for Reading Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently 60
Increase Parent Participation In Educational Process Increase English Proficiency Drop Out Prevention Improve School Attendance Improve Academic Performance rate and college entrance rates Improve Graduation Rate
Drop Out Prevention
youth/Congressional Awards Encourage Children To Go To College
Increase Graduation rates and college entrance Build Language Skills/Community Service
Parent Involvement Committee (PIC) Develop Parental skills (English Language, Public speaking, child Rearing) Develop a Sense of Community in the Migrant Community Adult ESL Classes Develop English Language Skills For Parents
Increase Parental Involvement in Educational Process Drop Out Prevention
Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Functions of the English Language Section 1.8 ­ Research Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationship Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Prediction Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions 61
In School Services (Training For District Staff In Working With Migrant And Limited English Children, Connecting Parents To School Districts, Advocating For Migrant Children In Local Schools) Prepare Migrant and LEP Children for Standardized Testing Extended Day Tutoring Programs
Increase Parent Participation In Educational Process Drop Out Prevention Parent Education Re Health, Parenting, Cultural Information, Etc.
Improve In School Instruction of LEP and Migrant Children Build School Awareness Of These Children's Needs Increase Parent /School Contact Improve Attendance, Improve Graduation Rates
(After School, Before School, Saturday) Build Basic Academic Skills Prepare For Standardized Testing ESL Training College Assistance Migrant Program (CAMP)
Homework Assistance Drop Out Prevention Improve Attendance
Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.1 ­ Unifying Themes Section 3.2 ­ Inquiry and Design Section 3.3 ­ Biological Sciences Section 3.4 ­ Physical Science, Chemistry and Physics Section 3.5 ­ Earth Sciences Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education Section 3.7 ­ Technological Devices Section 3.8 ­ Science, Technology and Human Endeavors Academic Standards for Environment and Ecology Section 4.1 ­ Watersheds and Wetlands Section 4.2 ­ Renewable and Nonrenewable Resources Section 4.3 ­ Environmental Health Section 4.4 ­ Agriculture and Society Section 4.5 ­ Integrated Pest Management 62
Help Migrant Children Get Higher Education Improve High School Graduation and Attendance Rates Information For Parents Improve Attendance Improve Family Literacy Performance and Student Basic Skills
Migrant Hot Line Get Children Enrolled In School Quickly Family Computer Centers Focusing on Computer Literacy and Online Instruction Preschool Family Literacy Programs Even Start/Migrant Even Start Head Start/Migrant Head Start Basic Skill Readiness Adult Basic Education Book Distribution Programs (RIF, Book Mailings)
Improve Basic and Family Literacy Skills
Improve English Language Technology Integration Into Extended Day and Summer Curriculum Increase Reading Skills Increase Family Involvement In Education Build Basic Skills Improve Language Development Improve Higher Order Thinking Skills Prepare for Standardized Testing Drop-Out Prevention Improve Attendance Improve Promotion Improve Graduation Rates
Section 4.6 ­ Ecosystems and Their Interaction Section 4.7 ­ Threatened, Endangered and Extinct Species Section 4.8 ­ Humans and the Environment Section 4.9 ­ Environmental Laws and Regulations Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles and Documents of Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship Section 5.3 ­ How Government Works Section 5.4 ­ How International Relationships Function Academic Standards for the Arts and Humanities Section 9.1 ­ Production, Performance and Exhibition of Dance, Music, Theatre and Visual Arts Section 9.2 ­ Historical and Cultural Contexts Section 9.3 ­ Critical Response Section 9.4 ­ Aesthetic Response Academic Standards for 63
Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Section 10.4 ­ Physical Activity Section 10.5 ­ Concepts, Principles and Strategies of Movement Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 Entrepreneurship 64
The Pennsylvania Migrant Education program conducted a yearlong program evaluation study done by a third-party evaluator.
The stated purposes of the evaluation were to determine: · · · The degree to which migrant education programs in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania are in compliance with federal requirements The level of effectiveness of programming The extent to which programming provides equitable access to programs and services for migrant children and their families
The evaluation includes measures to determine the effectiveness of programs within the nine project areas of the Commonwealth as well as measures to determine the overall effectiveness of the program for the Commonwealth.
Based on the data collected as reported in this evaluation, the following overall observations about the Pennsylvania Migrant Education Program are provided: Staffing · · · · Individuals involved in educating migrant students in Pennsylvania are dedicated, well-educated, versatile, hardworking professionals They share a common understanding of the goals and purpose of the migrant education program Staffs have great pride in their program and their work.
They believe Pennsylvania leads the nation in its efforts to education migrant students Project Area staff are diverse in culture and language and reflect the families they serve
Satisfaction with State Migrant Division Direction · · Project Area staff are satisfied overall with the state administration of the program They welcome the training, statewide initiatives, program guidelines, and administrative support provided by the state 65
· ·
They acknowledge and support the vision of the state leadership They appreciate the autonomy each Project Area has in meeting the goals of the program
Findings about Project Area Staff · Project Area managers have responsibility for implementing the MEP program in each project area.
They develop budgets, hire and manage staff, provide curriculum support, arrange transportation, develop partnerships, and communicate with state MEP staff.
There is close communication among Project Area Managers and other role-alike groups.
Recruiters play an indispensable role in identifying eligible families/students and are a key link between the program and the home.
Student support staff is key to ensuring the quality of the instruction, of implementing an appropriate educational plan for each child based on the needs assessment.
Data specialists are key to the accurate reporting of student data, and the maintenance of databases.
· · · ·
Findings about Programs · · · · · · · · · · The categorical nature of the funding for the program ensures that migrant children receive the support they need and that is intended for their continued academic achievement.
The summer program is a key component of the MEP program that is unique to each project area.
The schedule, curriculum, activities are designed by the PA staff to meet the needs of their students.
The focus is on enhancing the achievement of students, while building the self-esteem and the cultural pride of students.
There is some cross-project area sharing of curriculum, and other resources.
Each summer program has an extensive complement of partners that enhance the educational, physical and social experiences of the students.
Upper grade and college MEP students serve as staff.
International staff enriches some summer programs.
The regular school program is a key component of the MEP program.
Support for student achievement is the major focus of the extended day programs.
66
· · · · · · ·
Programs are designed at the Project Area level, to meet the needs of students and comply with the directives of the state.
Curriculum is determined in conjunction with the classroom teacher.
All eligible students are identified by recruiters and encouraged to attend.
Parents are kept informed about the purpose and value of the program.
Transportation is often provided.
Student Support Specialists are the key designers of the curriculum and oversee instruction.
These programs may be before, during or after school, or on Saturdays.
Programs are held in a variety of locations including schools, colleges, and other community facilities.
Eligible students not served by summer and extended day programs receive home-based programming.
Findings about Parent Involvement · · · Parents are essential to the program at the state and local level, and are encouraged to be actively involved in the education of their child.
Project area staffs are committed to helping parents become advocates for their children.
Parents are actively included in the program, some as staff, and others through parent activities.
Findings about other issues related to the MEP · · The State has no certification for teachers of English as a second language.
This impacts the quality of the instruction students receive especially in more remote areas.
Overall, the MEP has strong relationships with the school districts.
The Project Area staff supplement, and not supplant the education the districts are required to provide to the migrant students.
However, some project areas may need state support in working with some school districts that have not developed strong partnerships with the MEP staff.
67
Recommendations The following recommendations are based on the findings from the Evaluation of the Pennsylvania Migrant Education Program: · · · · · · · · · · · · Keep the MEP as a categorical program Provide more support for a longer period of time ­ through the college experience Continue to support the decentralized system of delivering services through the Project Areas Advocate for the State to consider additional requirements for teachers of English-Language Learners Provide strong support for Project Areas in informing districts about the requirements for educating children of migratory workers Explore how classroom teachers utilize the Student Portfolios from summer programs in the regular school year Continue to educate the districts about the roles of the MEP staff, and the requirements for data collection Continue to educate the districts about the role of the extended day and summer programs and encourage them to partner with the Project Areas Continue to pursue reciprocal data sharing with other states Continue to educate the public about migrant education Advertise the successes of the program Examine staff turnover and its relationship to salaries and benefits offered by the Project Areas
Summary The Pennsylvania Migrant Education program is a strong, comprehensive program as evaluated on the Eight Tasks.
Each of the tasks examined are being carried out by the project managers and their staff with knowledge of the students, the program, the state curriculum and accountability system, and the culture of the communities.
68
In addition a yearlong look at technology integrated into curriculum was evaluated through a third-party evaluator.
The results of that study are as follows: Technology Integrated Instruction ·Significant differences in pre/post test scores of control and experimental groups ·Both groups improved ·Improvement of experimental group was greater in all areas.
Classroom environment has a positive effect on migrant student achievement .
English Language Development ·26.3% of students in Experimental Group advanced 2 or more levels compared to 5.8% in the Control Group ·35.3% minimal improvement in English oral language skills ·45.7% good progress ·19% excellent progress in Basic Skills of Spelling and Reading Comparison of pre/post test scores shows a significantly higher level of improvement for experimental group ·Mathematics · 47.8% of students in the Control group improved their test scores compared to 21.5% in the Experimental group · 57% showed significant improvement in Language Arts and reading · 78% were better able to follow directions Positive results reflected in test results and teacher comments highlight the benefits of technology integration in instruction for migrant students.
Not only were academic effects reported, but also behavioral, emotional and motivational gains were also cited.
The Planning and Evaluation Service of the U. S. Department of Education published a three-volume study, The Same High Standards for Migrant Students: Holding Title I Schools Accountable which examines how the federal Migrant Education Program (MEP) is helping migrant students succeed in school and meet academically challenging standards, and whether states and districts are including migrant students in standards-based reforms.
The study found that principals and teachers in Title I schools serving migrant students have lower expectations about how well their students can perform than teachers in other Title I schools.
Fewer seniors in Title I schools with migrant students have taken higherlevel mathematics courses compared with seniors in other schools.
Title I schools with migrant students have higher percentages of 69
inexperienced teachers, teachers who are teaching in fields for which they are not certified, as well as teachers who hold emergency or temporary certification.
Many of the Title I schools that served migrant students used different standards for their Limited-English Proficient students.
A significant percentage of migrant students did participate in state or district assessments in the 1997-1998 school year, but very few of these schools received the results of the assessments disaggregated by migrant status.
Some states and school districts are implementing promising practices to promote continuity of instructional services for migrant students to respond to the effects caused by changing schools on students' academic performance.
Key Findings: A Summary · Expectations about student performance were low in Title I schools serving migrant students.
Some principals in Title I elementary schools with medium-to-high numbers of migrant students reported that standards were too hard for a significant portion of their students, and that a large percentage of these students were not prepared to do the work at the next grade level.
This finding is similar to NLSS findings concerning differences between the highest-poverty and lower-poverty Title I elementary schools.
Many of the Title I schools that served migrant students used different standards for their Limited-English Proficient students.
Many migrant students are also Limited-English Proficient.
Over half of the Title I schools with medium-to-high numbers of migrant students are classified as schools with 25 percent or more Limited-English Proficient students.
Contrary to the requirements of the Title I program, principals in Title I elementary schools reported that their schools used alternate state content standards and different student performance standards for Limited-English Proficient students.
States' knowledge of migrant student participation in assessments was weak.
States reported that they did not have a way to estimate the percentage of migrant students participating in assessments because the number of students exempted from assessments is typically a local decision that is often not reported to the state.
Based on national survey data, principals reported that 70 percent of migrant elementary students and 90 percent of migrant secondary students participated in assessments in the 1998-1999 school year.
Mobility and language difficulties were the two leading barriers to migrant students' participation in statewide assessments.
Few schools with migrant students received disaggregated achievement scores.
The single greatest barrier to evaluating migrant student achievement data systems is the lack of capacity that most state and local data systems currently have to link individual migrant student records with state and district databases.
Few states pursue data on graduation and dropout rates because of the investment of resources involved, and because they are not legislatively required to do so.
Fewer students in Title I schools that serve migrant students were enrolled in higher-level courses.
Fewer seniors in Title I schools with medium-to-high numbers of migrant students had taken higher-level mathematics courses compared with seniors in other Title I schools.
70
·
·
·
·
·
Teachers in schools serving migrants were less experienced.
Teachers in Title I elementary schools with medium-to-high numbers of migrant students had fewer years of teaching experience than teachers in other Title I elementary schools.
These schools also reported that more teachers were teaching in fields for which they were not certified and held emergency or temporary certification.
Many of these differences were similar to those between highest- and lower-poverty schools.
Title I schools with migrant students tend to be much poorer, and have high proportions of students who are minorities and limited-English proficient.
Many of the differences between Title I schools with no or few migrant students and schools with medium-to-high numbers of migrant students parallel the differences between Title I schools that are relatively lower in poverty and those that are highest-poverty.
A few states and school districts are committed to aligning local instruction between programs that shares migrant students.
In particular, these states and districts were committed to aligning with the students' home base schools for curricular content and course requirements.
Some examples of alignment policies included the following: LEP students were placed in the same type of English acquisition program as their home base school; trading partners compared their individual languages assessments scores to place migrant students in the same types of coursework; and trading partners agreed on common grade placement policies.
Technology is enabling states and districts to access other states' and districts' content and performance standards.
The use of technology provided solutions to the problems of accessing information and providing instruction to difficult-to-reach students.
Technology was used to transfer information on students' academic records between trading partners, provide individualized instruction, and provide access to another state or district's assessments and standards.
·
·
·
Other websites with additional evaluation studies on migrant education include: Martinez, Y.G. and Velázquez, J.A. (2000).
Involving Migrant Families in Education ERIC Digest.
Charleston, WV: ERIC Clearinghouse on Rural Education and Small Schools, Appalachia Educational Laboratory.
http://www.ael.org/page.htm?
71
Program Director: Manuel Recio, Ed.D.
PA Department of Education Division of Migrant Education 333 Market Street, 5th floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Tele: (717) 783-6466 FAX: (717) 783-4392 mrecio@state.pa.us Locations: The statewide program is implemented through five local operating agencies: Chester County Intermediate Unit #24, Exton, (610)- 524-5051 Serving: Chester, Bucks, Delaware, Montgomery and Philadelphia Counties Project Area Manager: Dr. Ambrose Finnegan Central Susquehanna IU #16 Lewisburg, (717) 523-1155 Serving: Bradford, Carbon, Columbia, Lackawanna, Luzerne, Lycoming, Monroe, Montour, Northumberland, Pike, Potter, Schuylkill, Snyder, Sullivan, Susquehanna, Tioga, Union, Wayne and Wyoming Counties Project Area Manager: Sue Stetler Lincoln Intermediate Unit #12 New Oxford, (717) 624-4616 Serving: Adams, Allegheny, Armstrong, Bedford, Blair, Cambria, Cameron, Centre, Clarion, Clearfield, Clinton, Elk, Fayette, Forrest, Franklin, Fulton, Greene, Huntingdon, Indiana, Jefferson, Juniata, Mifflin, Somerset, Washington, Westmoreland, Cumberland, Dauphin, Lebanon, Perry and York Counties Project Area Manager: Suzanne Benchoff Northwest Tri-County Intermediate Unit #5, Edinboro, (814) 734-5610 Serving: Beaver, Butler, Crawford, Erie, Lawrence, Mckean, Mercer, Venango and Warren Counties Project Area Manager: Greg Martin Millersville University, Millersville, (717) 872-3678 Serving: Lehigh, Northampton, Lancaster, and Berks Counties Project Area Manager: Frances Mannino Corse
72
Pregnant and Parenting Teen Program Program The PPT program awards grants to local education agencies to assist pregnant and parenting teens overcome obstacles that compromise their abilities to stay in school, obtain a high school diploma, deliver healthy babies, and become capable parents and self-sufficient adults.
PPT programs provide a continuum of services that includes academic, social, vocational and individual support within the context of a coordinated community response.
Eligible participants include pregnant or parenting teens who are pursuing a high school diploma.
Activities Individual and group supportive services Student Impact Encourages regular school attendance Provides personal and peer support Reduce dropout rate Encourages graduation Encourages GPA progress Health care and nutritional education
Addresses importance of preand post-natal care Promotes good parenting practices regarding infant care Assists with access to health care and nutrition for mother and child
Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.12 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Preventions Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development
Child development and parenting
Builds knowledge of parenting skills and child development Enhances skills to develop positive parent-child relationships
Vocational and career planning
Provides teens with training and resources on joining labor 73
force Assist students make a transition from school to work Promotes self sufficiency Coordination of community resources Assures comprehensive continuum of services
The following list includes a sample of research demonstrating the positive impact that the support and educational services provided by Pregnant and Parenting Teen Program have on academic success.
National Organization on Adolescent Pregnancy, Parenting and Prevention 2401 Pennsylvania Ave.
NW Suite 350 Washington, DC 20037 (202) 293-8370 www.noappp.org Title: School Based Programs for Adolescent Parents and Their Young Children: An Overview Comprehensive overview of school based programs targeting adolescent parents.
Topics include why school-based programs are needed for adolescent parents, their expected outcomes, strategies, barriers, and the lessons that have been learned.
Center for Assessment and Policy Development 111 Presidential Boulevard Suite 234 Bala Cynwyd, PA 19004 (610) 664-4540 www.capd.org
74
Title: Improving Outcomes for Teen Parents and Their Young Children by Strengthening School-Based Programs: Challenges, Solutions and Policy Implications This publication addresses the importance of school-based efforts for the adolescent parent and their children so they can be more effective in meeting the needs and improving outcomes for these young families.
The National Campaign to Prevent Teen Pregnancy 1776 Massachusetts Ave.
NW Suite 200 Washington, DC 20036 (202) 478-8500 www.teenpregnancy.org Title: Partners In Progress; The Education Community and Preventing Teen Pregnancy Because the relationship between academic failure and teen pregnancy is so strong, and because young people spend so much of their time in school, the education community and the teen pregnancy prevention community should see themselves as natural allies.
This document references statistics on teen pregnancy and academic failure and offers ideas on ways the education community can help prevent teen pregnancy.
Contact: Shileste Overton Morris Youth Development Manager Center for Schools 
75
Safe And Drug-Free Schools and Communities Statutory Authority: No Child Left Behind, ESEA Title IV, Part A Program The Safe and Drug-Free Schools and Communities Act is to support programs in all local educational agencies (LEAs) and consortia of such agencies that prevent violence in and around schools; that prevent the illegal use of alcohol, tobacco, and drugs; that involve parents and communities; and that are coordinated with related Federal, State, school, and community efforts and resources to foster a safe and drugfree learning environment that supports student academic achievement.
Activities A. Development of Local Advisory Council composed of students, parents, school staff, and community members.
The Council provides a required linkage between schools, parents, and the community, thus encouraging community-wide strategy building that supports a comprehensive drug and violence prevention and early intervention plan.
B. Use various forms of student behavior data to assess need for specific prevention programs, (State Report, PDE 360, etc.).
C. Select prevention programs to address needs identified during the assessment.
D. Involve members of the Advisory Council and the community in implementing selected prevention or positive growth programs.
E. Periodically evaluate the prevention or positive growth programs for effectiveness and institute changes where necessary to improve student Increases attendance Improves grades Improves behavior and/or social skills Increases high school diploma rate Lowers school drop-out rates Increases feelings of safety in hl Student Impact Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education: Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Section 4.29 ­ HIV/AIDS and Other Life-Threatening and Communicable Diseases Assessment: Section 4.51 ­ State Assessment System Section 4.52 ­ Local Assessment System 76
achievement and school success.
Multiple prevention programs are available for LEA's for selection and implementation.
Student Assistance Program (SAP) is a team concept that consists of educators; support staff, Drug and Alcohol and /or Mental Health Liaisons.
The team works with students and their parents to remove barriers to learning.
Peer Mediators Program Bullying, Harassment and Prevention Programs Hazing
school Academic Standards for Reading, Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function of the English Language Section 1.8 ­ Research Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and 77
Improves positive (trust) relationship between staff and students Decreases are evident in the rate of alcohol, tobacco, and other drugs (ATOD) used and abused by students Decreases are evident in the rate of bullying and harassment incidents
Assistance from Community AgenciesThe local educational agencies or consortia may seek public or private entities such as the Drug and Alcohol Single County Authority and others to provide technical assistance, conduct training, demonstrations and evaluations; these entities may also provide supplementary services and community­wide drug and violence prevention of drug use and violence prevention planning and organizing activities among students and youth Examples: Anger management groups Eating Disorder groups Suicide Support groups Grief Support groups Academic Support groups Relationship Development groups Emotional Support groups Etc.
School/Agency Collaboration examples: The Safe and Drug-Free Schools and Communities Act requires coordination between other federal, state, community and school programs that foster a safe and drugfree environment that supports academic achievement.
Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) Letters of agreement (SAP) Examples: Safe School Initiative The Safe and Drug-Free Schools and Communities Act requires local educational agencies to establish and carry out the following: Safe School Plan Crisis Response Plan Security Assessment of schools
Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Sections 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.2 ­ Inquiry and Design Section 3.5 ­ Earth Sciences Section 3.8 ­ Science, Technology and Human Endeavors Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles and Documents of Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship Section 5.3 ­ How Government Works Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Science Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community 78
Responsibility Section 11.4 ­ Child Development Research ­ Many prevention programs make up the Safe and Drug-Free Schools and Communities grant.
The United States Department of Education has created a list of exemplary and promising prevention programs.
A 15-member Expert Panel oversaw a valid and reliable process for identifying effective school-based programs that promote healthy students and safe, disciplined, and drug-free schools.
http://www.ed.gov/index.jsp Progress in Prevention, Report on the National Study of Local Education Agency Activities under the Safe and Drug Free Schools and Communities Act, U.S. Department of Education, Office of the Under Secretary, Planning and Education Service, Doc #2002-003.
Submitted by: Irene Hantman, Scott Crosse from Westat.
Center for the Study and Prevention of Violence, http://www.colorado.edu/cspv/research/violenceschools.html Center for Substance Abuse Prevention, http://www.preventionregistry.org/ Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration, CSAP Model Programs, http://modelprograms.samhsa.gov Education Department And Secret Service Release Threat Assessment Guide For Schools, http://www.nclb.gov/media/news/060502.html Dan Iser Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-787-6406 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: diser@state.pa.us Sheldon Winnick Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-772-2066 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: swinnick@state.pa.us
Contacts: Myrna M. Delgado, Chief Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-772-2813 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: mdelgado@state.pa.us Marlene Kanuck Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-9294 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: mkanuck@state.pa.us
79
Deborah Strayer Network for Student Assistance Services 1216 Pleasant Valley Boulevard, Suite A Altoona, PA 16602 Voice: 814-944-4355 Fax: 814-941-6094 Email: dstreg6@aol.com Renee Urick Network for Student Assistance Services 6 South Main Street, Box 540 Washington, PA 15301 Voice: 724-222-7991 Fax: 724-222-7913 Email: rureg8@voicenet.com
Margaret Innes Network for Student Assistance Services P.O. Box 953 Kimberton, PA 19442-0953 Voice: 610-935-8532 Fax: 610-935-8553 Email; region1@erols.com Marie Bozelli Network for Student Assistance Services Franklin Educational Center 139 Reiger Road Butler, PA 16001 Voice: 724-284-9183 Fax: 724-284-9186 Email: mboz183657@aol.com
Beth Sprentz Network for Student Assistance Services Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-772-2813 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: beths@penn.com
Kim Swarner Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-6777 Fax: 717-783-2008 Email: kswarner@state.pa.us
80
Safe Schools Statutory Authority: Act 26 of 1995; Act 30 of 1997; Act 36 of 1999 Program The Safe Schools Initiative assists public school districts, charter schools, intermediate units, area vocational technical schools or consortia in preventing and reducing violence within schools and on school property to create safer learning environments for students and teachers through programs which address school violence.
Activities The following list of activities (from A-F) represent the process used to develop, outreach and review a comprehensive safe school plan: A. Development of a School Safety committee with representative from staff, students, parents and community.
B. Conduct a safety needs/ a threat assessment C. Develop a comprehensive Safe School Plan D. Request feedback from school and community on plan E. Communicate the plan and outreach staff, students, parents, community organization and the community in general.
F. Establish a Memorandum of Understanding between school and law enforcement agencies Promotes student/school/community bonding and opportunities for active involvement in finding solutions to schools problems Improves school climate Student Impact Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education ­ Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Assessment: Section-4.29-HIV/AIDS and Other Life-Threatening and Communicable Diseases Section 4.51 ­ State Assessment System 81
Section 4.52 ­ Local Assessment System The general components of a Comprehensive safe School Plan are the following: Review and communicate school discipline and safe schools policies and procedures.
Translate policies into workable procedures.
Implementation of fair and sensible disciplinary process Provides clear standards of behavior via clear policies Provides clear procedures for resolving student conflict Improves student and school connectedness Students and staff feel safe Academic Standards for Reading Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function of the English Language Section 1.8 - Research Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation 82
Guidelines, Policies and Procedures
Planning, implementation and practice If needed: hire security personnel, purchase security equipment and technology Staff development in classroom management, improving school climate build connection to school through caring school practices and classrooms.
Improves sense of emotional security and safety.
Improves perception and relationship between students and law enforcement Improves school climate, improve attendance
School Climate and Classroom Management Activities
Implementation of curriculum that deals with behavior and socialemotional learning, bullying, conflict resolution and peer mediation, promoting citizenship, service learning, character d i d hb d
Improves school climate, improve attendance, reduces dropout rate, improves behavior and academic performance
education and research based programs.
Enhances children's social, emotional, and ethical behavior Positive impact on health, character and civic responsibility Increases respect for laws and consequences
Implementation of Intervention Programs
Identification of antisocial behavior: Identification of students at risk Provide referrals and services: Student Assistance Program In-school support: counseling, support groups Linkages with community agencies In school and after school activities for those that are in need of extra academic support and social/ emotional behavior improvement.
Improves school climate Improves attendance Reduces drop-out rates Increase academic performance and parental involvement Increases academic performance Learn how to recognize and manage emotions Increases attendance; improve school grades; increase study skills Improves academic performance in standardized tests
Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles of Documents and Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship Section 5.3 ­ How Government Works Section 5.4 ­ How International Relationships Function Academic Standards for Economics Section 6.1 ­ Economic Systems 83
Alternative Education for Disruptive Youth Programs-a combination of intense, individualized academic instruction, behavior modification and counseling in an alternative setting to assist students to return successfully to the regular classroom-
Increases graduation rates Increase attendance rate; improve behavior and social skills Lower school drop-out rates Improve academic achievement
Section 6.2 ­ Markets and Function of Governments Section 6.3 ­ Scarcity and Choice Section 6.4 ­ Economic Interdependence Section 6.5 ­ Work and Earnings Academic Standards for the Arts and Humanities Section 9.1- Production, Performance and Exhibition of Dance, Theatre and Visual Arts Section 9.2-Historical and Cultural Context Section 9.3- Critical Response Section 9.4- Aesthetic Response Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Section 10.4 ­ Physical Activity 84
Implementation of Postvention Programs
Postvention efforts after a crisis Provide individual and student counseling and support Improve sense of emotional security Improve emotional security and strengthens relationships among students, teachers, families and others Positive impact on student behavior
Crisis Response Planning Develop a Multi- Hazard Safe School Plan- or Crisis Response Plan.
First responders and local emergency county emergency agencies need to be part of the committee.
Improve sense of safety and security Positive impact in school climate and enhances the sense of caring for school
Review and update as necessary staff development efforts Communicate the plan and outreach staff, students, parents, community organization and the community in general.
community
Section 10.5 ­ Concepts, Principles and Strategies of Movements Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 ­ Entrepreneurship
Program Evaluation
Provide tools and guidance for collecting and reporting data such as Improve programs the weapon and violence possession reports.
Gather data to assess progress, ensure accountability, and shape program implementation Evaluate student outcomes Improve students' academic achievement
There are many excellent resources in the area of safe schools that provide valuable data in different topics.
Please go to the Pennsylvania Department of Education Web site www.pde.state.pa.us.
If you go to K-12, Student Services and Programs section you can find: Crisis Response, Safe and Drug- Free Schools and Communities, Safe Schools Initiatives and Student Assistance Program.
85
The following list also includes a sample of research connecting safe schools and social emotional learning to academic success.
It also provides early warning identification and threat assessment information, best program practices, and evaluation tools.
Center for the Study and Prevention of Violence University of Colorado Title: Blueprints for Violence Prevention Web site- http://www.colorado.edu/cspv/index.html The Blueprints Initiative is a comprehensive effort to provide communities with a set of demonstrated effective programs and the technical assistance and monitoring necessary to plan for and develop an effective violence intervention.
The intervention programs identified as the Blueprints meet a strict standard of program effectiveness.
Search Institute Suite 210 700 S. Third Street Minneapolis, MN 55415 1-800-888-7828 612-376-8955 Fax- 612-376-8956 Web site- www.search-institute.org Independent, nonprofit, nonsectarian organization whose mission is to advance the well-being of adolescents and children by generating knowledge and promoting its application.
At the heart of the institute's work is the framework of 40 developmental assets, which are positive experiences, relationships, opportunities, and personal qualities that young people need to grow up healthy, caring, and responsible.
Created in 1990, the framework is grounded in research on child and adolescent development, risk prevention, and resiliency.
There are a number of scientific research studies in assets and academic achievement and how communities attend to young people's developmental needs.
U.S. Department of Education Office of Educational Research and Improvement Office of Elementary and Secondary Education Safe and Drug-Free Schools Program Web site: http://www.ed.gov/pubs/edpubs.html Toll free: 1-877-433-7827 or 1-877-4-ED-PUBS Title: Exemplary and Promising Safe, Discipline, and Drug-Free Schools Programs (2001) This publication provides descriptions of the 9 exemplary programs and 33 programs selected by the Expert panel in 2001.
Contact information for each program is also provided.
They also have program description and professional development resources and program cost prepared based on information provided by the developers.
86
Title: The Final Report and Findings of the Safe School Initiative: Implications for the Prevention of School Attacks in the United States, a publication of the U.S. Secret Service and the U.S. Department of Education.
(May 2002) Title: Threat Assessment in Schools: A Guide to Managing Threatening Situations and to Creating Safe School Climates, a publication of the U.S. Secret Service and the U.S. Department of Education (May 2002) Title: Safeguarding Our Children: An Action Guide: Implementing Early Warning, Timely Response (June 2000).
Helps schools develop and carry out a violence prevention and response plan that can be customized to fit each school's particular strengths.
This book present strategies that schools have used successfully to create and implement violence prevention plans; provides examples of sound practices and programs; and offer suggestions on recognizing, reporting and using early warning signs effectively.
Title: Early Warning, Timely Response: A Guide to Safe Schools (August 1998).
Contains early warning signs that can help adults identify and reach out to troubled children quickly and effectively to reduce the likelihood of school violence.
This guide was jointly issued by the U. S. Department of Education and the U.S. Department of Justice.
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) Title: 2001 Annual Report of Science­Based Prevention Programs Web site http://www.samhsa.gov/centers/csap/modelprograms/pdfs/2001Annual.pdf Review existing and recent advances in science based knowledge on substance abuse prevention.
Evaluation resources are extremely helpful to have some are the following: Title: Getting to Outcomes: Methods and Tools for Planning, Self Evaluation and Accountability Manual Volume I: http://www.stanford.edu/~davidf/GTO_Volume_I.pdf Volume2: http://www.stanford.edu/~davidf/GTO_Volume_II.pdf Comprehensive training manual designed to provide specific skills and tools to measure the effectiveness of prevention efforts.
Title: Prevention Works! A Practitioners Guide to Achieving Outcomes Web site www.samhsa.gov/centers/csap/modelprograms/pdfs/Prevention.pdf Guide to help figure out what prevention programs work, what doesn't work and why.
Designed for personnel with some experience in evaluation.
Others without experience may need the help of an evaluator to use this guide.
87
The Collaborative for Academic, Social and Emotional Learning (CASEL) Dept. of Psychology (M/C 285) University of Illinois at Chicago 1007 West Harrison Street Chicago, Illinois Phone 312-413-1008 Fax 312-355-0559 E-Mail: casel@uic.edu Web site- www.casel.org Provides different links to effective social, emotional and academic learning programs.
It also contains an extensive online library of classic research articles and is continually updating with the latest research finding in the field of social and emotional learning.
It also provides connections to major federal sources of information and funding, private foundations interesting in SEL, educational organizations for professionals and parents, and scientific organizations.
There latest publication Safe and Sound An Educational Leader's Guide to Evidence- Based Social and Emotional Learning Programs provides detailed information on background, theory and scientific basis for effective programs.
In addition, provides listing and description of effective programs.
This publication was possible by grants from the U.S. Department of Education's Office of Educational Research and Improvement and Safe and Drug Free Schools Program School Mental Health Project, Department of Psychology, UCLA Center for Mental Health in Schools Box 951563 Los Angeles, California 90095-1563 Co-directed by Howard Adelman and Linda Taylor Phone 310- 925-3634 Fax 310-206-8716 Web site- http://smhp.psych.ucla.edu This project was established in 1986 to pursue theory, research, practice, and training related to addressing mental health and psychological concerns through school-based interventions.
The Center is one of two national centers focusing directly on mental health in schools.
Its goals are to enhance in strategic ways 1) availability of and access to resources to improve and advance mental health in schools, 2) the capacity of systems/personnel, and 3) the role of schools in addressing mental health, psychosocial, and related health concerns.
The Center has published a number of issue papers related to expanding educational reform to address barriers to learning and other issues related to this area.
88
Research papers Hawkins,J.D.
(1997).
Academic Performance and School Success: Sources and Consequences.
In R.P.Weissberg, T.P. Gullota, R.L. Hamptom, B.A. Ryan, 
Enhancing Children's Wellness (pp. 278-305).
Thousands Oaks.
CA:Sage.
This article summarizes the evidence regarding the link between academic performance and health risk behaviors, including substance abuse, delinquency, teen sexual activity, and violence.
Contains 64 references.
The social development model is outlined to organized evidence on effective schools.
The theory provides and example of a framework that can be used to select and implement school and classroom practices to promote the development of academic, social and emotional competence in children.
It also provides examples of effective practices in promoting academic, social and emotional competence.
McNeely, C.A., Nonnemaker,J.M., 
(2002) Promoting School Connectedness: Evidence from the National Longitudinal Study of Adolescent.
Health.Journal of School Health, 72(4),138-146.
Increased evidence shows that when adolescents feel cared for by people at their schools and feel like a part of their school, They are less likely to use substances, engage in violence, or initiate sexual activity at an early age.
This study examined the association between school connectedness and the school environment to identify ways to increase students' connectedness.
Positive classroom management climates, participation in extracurricular activities, tolerant disciplinary policies, and small school size were associated positively with higher school connectedness.
Gottfredson,G.D.,
What schools do to prevent problem behavior and promote safe environments.
Journal of Educational and Psychological Consultation, 12, 313-344.
This article reports results from a survey conducted in a probability sample of U.S. public, private, and Catholic schools to obtain information about the nature and extent of activity to prevent problem behavior.
Results imply that schools engage in a large number of activities ranging from security and surveillance, through school climate change, to counseling and curricular or instructional programs.
Most schools have strict rules about dangerous behaviors.
Suspension is used extensively and expulsion appear unnecessary.
Many of the activities in which schools are engaged to prevent safety and prevent problem behavior have not been the subject of evaluation, so research provides little information about the effectiveness of what schools now do.
: 89
The Department of Education, through the Pennsylvania Safe Schools Initiative has awarded funds to over 425 school districts, intermediate units, vocational technical schools and charter schools to implement prevention and intervention strategies to create safer learning environments.
For more information about this initiative, the funded sites or prevention and safe schools strategies, contact: The Office of Safe Schools-Safe Schools Initiative Dr. Maritza Robert Office of Safe Schools Project Manager 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-3755 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: mrobert@state.pa.us Terri Houck Center for Schools and Communities Program Manager-Safe Schools Lemoyne, PA 17043 Voice: 717-763-1661 Fax: 717-763-2083 Email: thouck@csiu.org Shirley Gould Office of Safe Schools Violence and Weapon Report Coordinator 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-787-4605 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: sgould@state.pa.us
90
Service-Learning (www.pitt.edu/~psla) "Service-learning is a method of teaching that enriches learning by engaging students in meaningful service to their schools or communities through careful integration with established curricula."
-Corporation for National and Community Service.
Program Service-learning efforts are different in each school because each school and community has different needs and assets.
Some projects involve one class for just a few weeks while others involve the whole school for many years.
Service-learning is a method whereby students learn and develop through active participation in thoughtfully organized service that is conducted in and meets the needs of communities.
Service-learning is coordinated with an elementary school, secondary school, institution of higher education, or community service program and the community.
Activities Although specific activities are determined by individual projects, all service learning contains the following elements: Students select service based on community need and student input.
Teachers, students, and community partners link research and curriculum goals to service-learning effort.
Students cooperate to address community need through direct, indirect or advocacy service.
Teachers, students, and community partners guide reflection activities to solidify the link between the curriculum, service, and student and community development.
Student Impact Using service learning as a teaching methodology has many impacts on students, classrooms and school environments.
These impacts which have been found in an array of rigorous studies include: · · Increased attendance Increased grades
Chapter 4, Standards and IEP Each Service-Learning project will address a different group of standards and IEP goals (see example below).
The following sections of Chapter 4 are addressed in most service-learning projects: Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education: Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements 91
· Increased intrinsic motivation to learn subject matter · · Civic Value Development Increased graduation rate
· Decreased disciplinary referrals · · Prosocial development Reinforced character lessons
· Reinforced academic learning
learning Service-learning helps foster civic responsibility.
Service-learning is integrated into and enhances the academic curriculum of the students or the education components of the community service program in which the participants are enrolled.
Service-learning provides structured time for students or participants to reflect on the service experience.
Teachers, students, and community partners assess learning and community impact to ensure efforts meet goals.
Teachers, students, and community members celebrate their achievements together.
· Reinforced job skills Academic Standards for Reading, Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function of the English Language Section 1.8 ­ Research
· Increased awareness of career options · Increased civic participation
· Improved critical thinking skills · More inclusive classroom/school environment.
· Increased exchange with community.
Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems · Increased school/ community and Number Relationships cooperation Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and · Increased opportunities for Connections students to demonstrate Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem mastery of state standards Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis] · Improved school to career Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions transition Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention 92
Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles and Documents of Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship Section 5.3 ­ How Government Works Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education Section 3.7 ­ Technological Devices Section 3.8 ­ Science, Technology and Human Endeavors Academic Standards for Environment and Ecology Section 4.8 ­ Humans and the Environment Section 4.9 ­ Environmental Laws and Regulations Academic Standards for Geography Section 7.3 ­ The Human Characteristics of Places and Regions Section 7.4 ­ The Interactions Between People and Places
93
Academic Standards for Economics Section 6.2 ­ Markets and the Functions of Governments Section 6.3 ­ Scarcity and Choice Section 6.5 ­ Work and Earnings Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 ­ Entrepreneurship Below you will see two examples of service-learning projects.
Program Example: Elementary students developed a student-run food bank in their school.
Activities Through research, students identified the issue of hunger in their community.
The students visited a local food bank to work with the staff and learn about the organization.
Together they developed a plan so the students could support the food bank from their school.
Student Impact · Increased awareness of community issues · Enhanced understanding of community demographics · Increased awareness of career options · Reinforced career skills Academic Standards * and IEP connections** Section 1.8 Research Section 7.3 ­ The Human Characteristics of Places and Regions Section 1.6.A Listening to others.
Section 13.1.Career Awareness and Planning: Community based jobs IEP connection: Social, Emotional or Behavioral Section 1.6.D Speaking and Listening: Contribute to discussions IEP connections: Cognitive and Problem Solving 94
· Increased exchange with community · Increased critical thinking skills
Students worked together to design a poster campaign that informed the student body about hunger in their community and conveyed information about the food bank project.
Students wrote and presented public service announcements to promote project activities over the school's audio-visual system.
· ·
Increased civic participation Increased interpersonal skills
Section 9.4.D Aesthetic Response: Artistic choices Section 13.3.C Career Retention: Teamwork IEP connections: Fine Motor Skills
· Increased intrinsic motivation to learn subject matter · Increased problem solving skills
Section 1.4.C Types of Writing: Persuasive pieces Section 3.8.B Science, Technology and Human Endeavors: Instruments Section 9.1.3
Computation and Estimation Section 2.6.
Statistics and Data Analysis IEP connection: Gross Motor Skills
A life skills class partnered with a math class to collect and keep accurate records of the food donations and graph the results.
· Increased acceptance of student responsibility · Reinforced career skills · Increased opportunities for students to demonstrate mastery of state standards · More inclusive classroom/school environment · Increased attendance · Increased skills in project management · Increased connection with community
At the end of each month students published the results of the donations along with student reflections in a short flier and sent to students' homes.
Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 Quality of Writing Section 3.7.D Technological Devices: Computer Software IEP connections: Communication 95
Students planed, hosted and attended a spring banquet with partners from the food bank to celebrate accomplishments.
· Increased school/community cooperation and communication · Prosocial development · Increased awareness of school and community resources
Section 1.6.C Speak using skills appropriate to formal speech situations Section 1.8 Research Section 11.1.A Financial and Resource Management: Resource Management Section 11.1.B Spending Plan Section 11.1.F.
Purchasing IEP connections: Cognitive 
* This is not a complete list.
Individual groups may address more and/or different standards than those listed here.
** IEP connections have been generalized.
The specific IEP goals that have been addressed by activities can be easily identified through activity task analysis.
Academic development through service learning has been the focus of several studies in which researchers have found a correlation between service learning participation and increases in students' grades (Dean 
Additionally, research suggests service learning increases students' likelihood of reporting that they performed to their potential, ability to apply course principles to new situations, and classroom learning (Markus et al., 1993).
Related findings suggest a correlation between service and decreased truancy (Yates 
Still others have demonstrated a relationship between service learning participation and an increased likelihood of course completion, as well as an increased ability to link course lessons to civic or career situations (Axsom, 1999).
Axsom, T., 
Effects of service learning on student retention and success.
National Society for Experiential Education Quarterly, 15-19.
Dean, L., 
The effect of voluntary service on adolescent attitudes toward learning.
Journal of Volunteer Administration, 5-10.
Markus, G.B., Howard, J., 
Integrating community service and classroom instruction enhances learning: Results from an experiment.
Educational Evaluation and Policy Analysis, 15(4), 410-419.
Shumer, R. (1994).
Community-based learning: Humanizing education.
Journal of Adolescence, 17(4), 357-367.
96
The National Commission on Service-Learning.
(2002).
Learning In Deed: The Power of Service-Learning for American Schools.
Yates, M., 
A developmental perspective on community service in adolescence.
Social Development, 5(1), 85-11.
For More Information: PDE's Service Learning State Coordinator Dorothy Hershey can be reached at 717-783-7089 (telephone); 717-783-6617 (fax) or dhershey@state.pa.us.
Contact persons for the Pennsylvania Service Learning Alliance's Regional Centers are: Cynthia Belliveau Ph.D. Eastern PA Director Franklin Building Annex 3451 Walnut Street, Suite P117 Philadelphia, PA 19104-3325 Phone: (215) 573-6535 Fax: (215) 573-1134 Email: bellivea@pobox.upenn.edu Cindy Wetmiller Western PA Director University of Pittsburgh William Pitt Union, Room 920 Pittsburgh, PA 15260 Phone: 412-648-1673 Email: psla@pitt.edu
97
Supplemental Educational Services (SES) Statutory Authority: Section 1116(e) of No Child Left Behind Act of 2002, Public Law 107-110
Program Supplemental educational services are additional academic instruction for lowincome students grades 1-12 enrolled in Title I schools that are in their second year of school improvement, in corrective action or in restructuring status.
Activities The types of instruction available include individual tutoring, small group instruction or distance learning in the areas of reading, math and language arts by Pennsylvania approved SES providers after regular school hours.
Student Impact The intent of supplemental educational services is to aid eligible students who are in identified schools in need of improvement and ensure that students can achieve at high levels.
Chapter 4 and Standards Supplemental educational services are to be aligned with the Pennsylvania academic standards and the curriculum of the student's local school.
Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education ­ Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School 98
Identified schools for improvement must notify parents of eligible students that SES will be made available to their child.
If there are too many eligible students who seek services, then the school will have to give priority to the lowest-achieving eligible students.
Parents choose an approved SES provider to best meet their child's needs.
If not satisfied
with services, parents may select another approved provider for SES.
Local school should monitor the services their students are receiving to determine the effectiveness on student performance.
Parents and teachers will receive a "report card" for their child from the service provider on a frequent basis indicating the student's progress or lack thereof.
School district pays SES service providers for student services with Title I, Part A funds.
The cost per student is the lesser of the actual cost of the services or the per-child allocation under Part A of Title I.
Graduation Requirements Assessment: Section 4.51 ­ State Assessment System Section 4.52 ­ Local Assessment System Academic Standards for Reading Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function of the English Language Section 1.8 - Research Academic Standards for Mathematics
The Pennsylvania Department of Education accepts, reviews and approves/does not approve applications from potential SES service providers including: Local educational
The SES application and instructions are located on PDE's website.
PDE staff provides technical assistance related to the application process and components as well as questions related to the
The Department approves SES service providers that have a demonstrated record of effectiveness, are financially sound and utilize highly qualified staff to increase the achievement of low performing
Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation 99
agencies (LEAs); Schools in an LEA that have been identified as making adequate yearly progress (AYP); Non-profit entities; For profit entities; and, Charter schools.
role of parents, local schools, PDE and approved service providers.
Once approved, the SES approved providers are placed on the PDE website listed by county for parent selection.
students.
Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus
The following resources are examples related to various aspects of tutoring programs such as Supplemental Educational Services.
However, these resources are in no way the only ones available.
Washington's Readiness to Learn Program: Highlights from the 2000-01 Statewide Evaluation The Readiness to Learn (RL) Program links education and other human service providers together to offer after-school and summer programs, tutoring and parenting skills classes.
Results include improvement in academic performance and statistically significant increases in GPA.
"Academic Performance and School Success: Sources and Consequences," 1997, by J. David Hawkins, Issues in Children's and Families Lives, Volume 8 Children who develop a commitment to succeed in school and who feel a sense of attachment to school and to their teachers are more successful academically than other children (Harachi, Abbott, Catalano 
100
Academic achievement has been affected consistently and positively by one-on-one tutoring of elementary students.
Tutoring by older students, adult community volunteers, trained paraprofessionals and certified teachers has produced substantial long-term improvements in students' achievement in reading and math.
(Wasik 
Tutoring provided by other students has positive effects on both tutors' and tutees' academic achievement and attitudes toward the subject covered across all achievement levels.
(Cohen, Kulik 
Research consistently finds that family involvement has a direct, positive effect on children's achievement and is the most accurate predictor of a student's success in school.
Reading/Writing Programs help low-achieving students recognize that focusing on reading and writing skills is the foundation for effective learning in all other subjects.
When all groups in a community provide collective support to the school, an infrastructure is created that provides a caring, supportive environment where youth can thrive and achieve.
Contact: Dr. Kerri McCarthy, Director Bureau of Performance Accountability and Reporting PA Department of Education 333 Market Street, 9th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-705-2343 Fax: 717-705-0708 Email: kemccarthy@state.pa.us
101
Successful Students' Partnership Statutory Authority: Pennsylvania Act 49 of 1987 Program Successful Students' Partnership is a program that provides grants to schools/school districts to design and implement specific strategies to improve attendance and academic success of school children.
Activities Specialized training for students Specialized training for faculty/staff (professional development) Specialized training/orientation for parents/families Homework help to focus on academic areas such as reading, writing, math, technology Mentoring/tutoring Career development Post-secondary focus Mentoring Web-based student information systems Counseling Bullying prevention Student Impact Decreases dropout rate Improves PSSA scores Increases attendance Increases grades, especially in targeted academic areas of need Increases graduation rates Chapter 4 and Standards Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education: Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements
Increases intrinsic motivation Academic Standards for Reading, Writing, to learn the subject matter Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Reinforces academic focus Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Pro-social development Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Increases self-esteem and Section 1.4 ­ types of Writing self-confidence Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening Reinforces academic Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function learning of the English Language Facilitates career exploration Section 1.8 ­ Research and development Promotes civic participation Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number systems and Number Relationships Promotes critical thinking 102
Peer mediation Transition services (for the middle to high school transition, and for transition from alternative programming to core curriculum/ classes
Increases connectedness Provides window to community Improves school/community cooperation Increases school/community collaboration Improves school to community transition Decreases disciplinary referrals Increases parental/family involvement
Section 2.2 ­ Computations and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education Section 3.7 ­ Technological Devices Academic Standards for Environment and Ecology Section 4.2 ­ Renewable and Nonrenewable Resources Section 4.3 ­ Environmental Health Section 4.6 ­ Ecosystems and Their Interactions Section 4.8 ­ Humans and the Environment Section 4.9 ­ Environmental Laws and Regulations Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles and Documents of Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities 103
of Citizenship Academic Standards for Economics Section 6.5 ­ Work and Earnings Academic Standards for Geography Section 7.3 ­ the Human Characteristics of Places and Regions Academic Standards for History Section 8.1 ­ Historical Analysis and Skills Development Section 8.2 ­ Pennsylvania History Section 8.3 ­ United States History Section 8.4 ­ World History Academic Standards for Arts and Humanities Section 9.1 ­ Production, Performance and Exhibition of Dance, Music, Theatre and Visual Arts Section 9.2 ­ Historical and Cultural Contexts Academic Standards for World Languages Section 12.1 ­ Communication in a Target Language Section 12.3 ­ The role of Culture in World Language Acquisition Section 12.5 ­ World Languages in the Community Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning Section 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition 104
(Getting a Job) Section 13.3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) Section 13.4 - Entrepreneurship Related literature/documentation: Washington's Readiness to Learn Program: Highlights from the 2000-01 Statewide Evaluation The primary purpose of the Readiness to Learn (RTL) Program is to link education and other human service providers together in an effort to ensure that all children are able to start the school day ready to learn.
RTL programs provided services such as afterschool and summer programs, tutoring and parenting skills classes.
Evidence of increased success in school included: · Elementary school teachers reported improvement in the academic performance of 51% of students referred for academic problems.
· Middle and high school students referred for academic problems showed a small but statistically significant increase in GPA.
· Elementary school teachers reported significantly fewer attendance problems for students referred for attendance problems.
· Actual attendance data for attendance referrals in all grade levels showed that 53% of the students improved their attendance.
· Elementary school teachers rated a significant improvement in behavior among students who had been referred for behavior problems.
· Students referred for behavior problems and who had at least one referral or detention at baseline received significantly fewer office referrals or detentions.
Present and Accounted for: Improving Student Attendance Through Family and Community Involvement, Joyce L. Epstein 
Cross-sectional (Kaplan, Peck 
They exhibit a pattern of increasing absenteeism throughout their schooling.
Efforts to decrease high school student dropout rates therefore might be most effective if substantial resources are directed toward preventing elementary and middle school students' withdrawal and distancing from education.
(p. 308) School characteristics and practices can influence rates of absenteeism and truancy among students...
Historically, schools have addressed issues of truancy by blaming individual students.
Truant and chronically absent students were considered deviants (Corville-Smith, 1995; Hoyle, 1998).
Schools rarely involved families until the problem was so severe that the students were failing their courses.
Families are now being recognized as an important influence on student attendance and an important resource 105
for decreasing truancy and chronic absenteeism (Cimmarusti, James, Simpson 
For example, parent involvement in checking homework and reading with a child is associated with improved report card grades, achievement scores, and subject-specific skills (Epstein, 1991; Epstein, Simon 
Other researchers have reported that specific family involvement practices such as parental monitoring, parent-child discussions, parent participation at the school, and PTA membership are linked to student attendance (Astone 
Some parenting activities are more likely than others to affect attendance.
The extant studies suggest that schools that want to increase daily student attendance are more likely to succeed if they reach out and work with parents in specific ways to address this problem.
(p. 309) After controlling for prior rates of student attendance and mobility, a study of 39 elementary schools found that the quality of family, school and community partnership programs was associated with rates of student attendance (Epstein, Clark, Salinas 
(p. 314) A few specific activities that involve families and the community on issues of attendance helped to reduce the percentage of students who missed 20 or more days of school... activities were rewarding students for improved attendance, connecting parents with school contact persons, and making home visits.
(p. 314) Schools that offered after-school programs reported greater increases in average daily student attendance and decreases in chronic absenteeism.
After-school programs are beneficial to parents who work and who need afternoon daycare for their children.
However, these programs really are targeted to students.
Students may be motivated to come to school so that they can participate in activities that are organized in the after-school program.
The impact of after-school programs, however, may also reflect some schools' overall sensitivity to the needs and challenges facing the families and communities they serve.
(p. 315-316) The study suggests that schools are more likely to improve student attendance and reduce chronic absenteeism with three broad strategies: (a) taking a comprehensive approach to attendance with activities that involve students, families and the community; (b) using more positive involvement activities than negative or punishing activities; and (c) sustaining a focus on improving attendance over time. (p. 317)
106
National Dropout Prevention Center website The Center has "identified 15 effective strategies that have the most positive impact on the dropout rate."
Below are those strategies that relate to the Successful Students' Partnership Initiative.
Early interventions: · Family Involvement: Research consistently finds that family involvement has a direct, positive effect on children's achievement and is the most accurate predictor of a student's success in school.
· Reading/Writing Programs: Early interventions to help low-achieving students recognize that focusing on reading and writing skills is the foundation for effective learning in all other subjects.
Basic Core Strategies: · Mentoring/Tutoring: Mentoring is a one-to-one caring, supportive relationship between a mentor and a mentee that is based on trust.
· Alternative Schooling: Alternative schools today are designed to provide an alternative to dropping out of school, with special attention to the student's individual social needs and the academic requirements for a high school diploma.
Alternative schools exist at all levels of K-12.
· Out of school experiences: Since learning happens all day long, 365 days a year, many schools are providing after-school and summer enhancement programs designed to eliminate information loss, inspire interest in a variety of areas, and expand the knowledge base.
Making the Most of Instruction: · Professional Development: Teachers who work with at-risk youth need to feel supported and need to have an avenue by which they continue to develop skills, techniques, and learn about innovative strategies.
Making the Most of the Wider School Community: · Systemic Renewal: A continuing process of evaluating goals and objectives will provide an organizational structure that allows each school to develop a learning environment that ensures quality education for all students.
· Community Collaboration: When all groups in a community provide collective support to the school, an infrastructure is created that provides a caring supportive environment where youth can thrive and achieve.
· Career Education/Workforce Readiness: Workforce readiness programs recognize that youth need specific skills to prepare them to measure up to the larger demands of today's workplace.
· Violence Prevention/Conflict Resolution: Students who don't feel safe at school will not want to stay in school.
Dealing with conflict constructively is a skill that when adopted into a school's culture will provide a safe environment for learning.
107
"Solving High School Attendance Problems: A Case Study, M. Wagstaff, L. Combs 
(p. 21) Students who exhibit poor attendance frequently display poor social skills and emotional functioning.
Truants are more likely to be bored and dislike school.
They may be unable to feel part of the school culture (Berg, Butler, Franklin, Hayes, Lucas 
Gaustad (1991) found a correlation between poor attendance and dropping out of school.
(p. 21) Telephone interview data suggested that parent contacts and notification concerning student absences were factors contributing to good attendance.
(p. 21) ...
Jordan, McPartland 
Therefore, it is incumbent upon educational institutions to intervene with these students in order to help them build a sense of belonging and a sense of acceptance.
(p. 27) Low attendance may reveal embedded school culture or climate issues that should be further explored.
Systemic changes such as those outlined in Breaking Ranks: Changing an American Institution, a research-based report of the National Association of Secondary School Principals (1996), are necessary in order to sustain meaningful improvements in student attendance and achievement.
Exploring the Social Contexts Influencing Student Success of Failure: Introduction, R. Van Acker 
Community services that do work provide coordinated and integrated children's services across school and community organizations.
The linking of parent, school and community resources through integrated efforts helps amplify children's and youth's sense of nurturance and support.
Effective and high-achieving schools serving students at risk for school failure tend to be smaller, highly engaged with families and the community, and more nurturing than low-achieving schools (Wang 
Effective schools implement site-specific 108
plans for school improvement; employ teams of teachers for the planning and delivery of instruction; and mobilize community and school resources to support a comprehensive, coordinated plan to meet the individualized needs of all students, including those who are at risk for school failure.
Any effort to prevent school failure must take important social contexts into consideration when designing prevention and intervention programs.
The family, peer group, the neighborhood and community, and the school each plays a critical role in child and youth development.
Any school-based effort to promote student success also should involve strategies that are nurturing and academically engaging.
"Social-Emotional Learning: A Foundation for Academic Success," by Karin Frey, Ph.D., Committee for Children Students without supportive peer relationships tend to do poorly in elementary school (Wigfield et.
Al., 1998) and are more likely than other students to drop out of high school (Asher 
"Academic Performance and School Success: Sources and Consequences," 1997, by J. David Hawkins, Issues in Children's and Families Lives, Volume 8 Children who develop a commitment to succeed in school and who feel a sense of attachment to school and to their teachers are more successful academically than other children (Harachi, Abbott, Catalano 
Strategies and Successes in School Dropout Prevention: A Forum Brief, from the American Youth Policy Forum, 1995 Some student behaviors are more likely precursors of dropping out of school than others.
For example, there is a strong correlation between repeated school tardiness and absenteeism and dropping out, while participation in extra-curricular activities tends to lead to staying in school because it provides students with another "hook" if they reject the academic side of school.
Low basic skills, being over-age for one's grade, social isolation, frequent moves to different schools, deficient support systems, siblings who have dropped out, and low socio-economic levels also correlate with a potential to leave school early.
Policy decisions can have important effects on the incidence of dropping out.
Dr. Smink indicated several widely used policies that directly result in young people dropping out of school.
These include: out-of-school suspensions; graduation requirements; no opportunities to make up work; no summer school; automatic failure if more than ten days are missed; grade retention.
Some policies may need to be changed, others are based on real needs and could be adapted to prevent dropping out.
For example, students could receive in-school suspension or have strict requirements to keep up with work while out of school.
In another example, summer, alternative or Saturday school could be used to make up work to avoid the necessity to retain students in the same grade.
The National Dropout Prevention Center uses the following techniques to address the needs of youth at-risk of dropping out of school: school restructuring, prevention, mediation, intervention and recovery.
Following is a description of each of these techniques: 109
· · ·
· ·
Restructuring schools so that they meet the needs of the learner is essential to successful and lasting education reform.
Restructuring demands a match between the needs of the students and the characteristics, climate, and practices of the settings in which the student must function or receive services.
Prevention includes approaches that anticipate, forestall, or deal with cognitive, social or personal problems before they irreparably impair a student's ability to perform.
Mediation is the process of providing an educational environment that ensures success for all students from pre-school through the 12th grade.
Mediation strategies are innovative curricular, instructional, and other school experiences designed to foster student engagement in learning.
Mediation is what you do before you "remediate" ­ it means "Doing It Right the First Time."
Mediation and school restructuring are related: both rely on a systemic approach, rather than a huge number of unconnected programs with only short-term funding.
Intervention is designed to interrupt or modify academic, school, or personnel problems that are negatively affecting a student's performance.
Recovery seeks to reunite young people with learning and education once they have left school.
This is, by its very nature, the most difficult, expensive and least successful of approaches to meeting the needs of dropouts.
Recovery can only focus on a small number of former students.
For these reasons, the Center has de-emphasized recovery and concentrated most on prevention.
The National Dropout Prevention Center considers the following criteria important for the success of dropout prevention programs: · Professional Development ­ Teacher Education programs don't usually equip teachers to work with young people in at-risk situations, so additional training is needed.
· Raising Reading Levels · Linking social services with schools helps the students and their families with a range of needs.
· Different Learning Styles · Mentoring · Peer-to-Peer Counseling · Alternative Schools · Parental Involvement "Respecting Cultural Diversity When Planning a Dropout Prevention Program," April 2000, by Roselyn Polk and Bill Evans, Children, Youth and Families Education and Research Network (CYFERNet) Some · · · components likely to contribute to academic failure among adolescents: Boredom Differing cultural and gender expectations Lack of parental involvement 110
· · ·
Low self-concept and inadequate social skills Stress and pressures in family and peer relations A sense of alienation and isolations
"School Dropout Prevention: Information and Strategies for Educators," by L. Hale and A. Canter, 1998 National Association of School Psychologists, from the National Mental Health and Education Center Who is at risk for dropping out? Ethnic status: Demographic information suggests that while African American students complete high school at a lower rate than whites, when adjusted for differences in family socioeconomic status, their completion rate is comparable.
Hispanic and Native American students, however, have lower high school graduation rates than whites and blacks, even when economic status is taken in to consideration...
Gender: ... boys and girls do no significantly differ in dropout rates.
However, they seem to drop out for different reasons: Girls are most likely to drop out of school due to pregnancy and marriage, while boys are more likely to drop out to seek employment.
Additionally, boys are twice as likely to dropout as girls due to behavioral difficulties.
Achievement: Poor academic performance is the single strongest predictor of dropping out of school.
Poor grades and low test scores, regardless of ability, may increase student frustration and reduce motivation to stay in school.
Additionally, retention in grade in highly related to dropping out of school ­ some research indicates that retained students are three times more likely to dropout than nonretained students.
Behavior: Students who drop out are more likely to have a history of serious behavior problems than those who complete high school, and this history may date back to the primary grades.
Prevention efforts may be enhanced by viewing behavior problems as symptoms of disengagement from school that can be addressed if identified early.
School attendance: School dropouts have higher rates of chronic truancy and tardiness than those who stay in school.
Attendance problems can be an early signal that the student is disengaging from the schooling process; daily school attendance reflects both student motivation and parental support.
Student attitudes toward school: Students who drop out are more likely to perceive the school setting as nonsupportive and/or irrelevant.
Some researchers suggest that the students' psychological attachment to school and investment in learning are keys to academic and social success, and consequently keys to remaining in school.
Family characteristics: Limited economic resources are highly related to school dropout rates, but the relationship appears to be indirect.
Many at-risk factors are related to family income ­ parents' education, single parenting, academic achievement, behavior problems and school attendance.
Peer relationships: Dropouts are more likely than nondropouts to report social isolation and lack of involvement in schoolbased social activities.
While dropouts tend to be involved in community-based activities, those who remain in school build social networks connected to school activities and develop a sense of "belonging" to the school that seems critical to continued engagement.
School organization and practices: The school itself appears related to dropout rates.
Schools with rigid, retention policies, widespread administrative transfers, emphasis on competency testing, tracking and perceived "unfair" discipline practices tend to have higher dropout rates.
Large class size, high teacher turnover, low teacher expectations for student performance, 111
and perceived lack of support for students with academic and behavior problems are also related to student decisions to drop out.
Community Values: The student's community can also contribute to the desire to remain in school or drop out.
Employment opportunities for unskilled workers might encourage dropouts, while communities that clearly value education and encourage schoolcommunity partnerships are more likely to establish programs and foster attitudes that maintain student engagement in schooling.
Supports available to ethnic minority and low-income students are critical to ensure school completion.
Prevention and Intervention Strategies Prevention activities might include incentives and supports to improve attendance: programs to encourage parent involvement; early intervention for academic difficulties (such as peer tutoring programs); community and school-based mentorships; and partnerships with community business to connect school to work.
Development of high school alternative programs that provide nontraditional approaches to vocational training and high school completion will also provide options for students who have not been successful in meeting the academic or social demands of the typical school program.
What Can Teachers Do to Help Students Stay in School? · Focus on student goals: Instead of focusing on why the student is unsuccessful in school, have the student identify what he wants to get from the school experience.
· Encourage school involvement: If students' lack of academic success restricts them from every activity except academics, they often see no value in continuing to try.
"Academic Performance and School Success: Sources and Consequences," 1997, by J. David Hawkins, Issues in Children's and Families Lives, Volume 8 Children who develop a commitment to succeed in school and who feel a sense of attachment to school and to their teachers are more successful academically than other children (Harachi, Abbott, Catalano 
As a result of opportunities and reinforcements experienced in social groups that model, condone, or approve of these behaviors, individuals may be encouraged to engage in such behaviors (Bourgois, 1995). (p. 285) If expectations are developed through a process that extends opportunities for active involvement to include faculty, staff, students and parents; if the endeavor helps develop skills for participation in the process; and if those who participate are recognized for their participation, commitment to the school and its standards and their maintenance should be broadened (Mortimore, 1995). (p. 286) Academic achievement has been affected consistently and positively by one-on-one tutoring of elementary students.
Tutoring by older students, adult community volunteers, trained paraprofessionals, and certified teachers has produced substantial long-term improvements in students' achievement in reading and math.
(Wasik 
(p. 289) The studies summarized here provide consistent evidence that interventions to improve classroom management and teaching practices in elementary schools can promote the academic performance of students, including those at greater risk of academic failure and health compromising behaviors. (p. 292) Probably the clearest implication from the Gottfredson (1986) study is that in the context of a whole-school improvement effort, selective and indicated preventive interventions with students at greatest risk of school failure and health-compromising behaviors can have beneficial effects on academic success and on a major health and education goal, that is, school completion, even when implemented late in development.
(p. 298) The Comer, Gottfredson, and Felner intervention studies provide evidence that elementary and secondary schools can be reorganized to achieve key characteristics of effective schools.
Each of these interventions explicitly involved faculty in more joint planning and the use of consistent approaches toward students, emphasized learning, and explicitly involved parents more actively in school life and the education of their children.
(p. 299) It (high quality public education) includes school administrators who view their role as leadership in the creation of a community of commitment to learning and positive social development through the communication of high expectations for achievement and behavior; the modeling of instructional and personal leadership; and the development of opportunities and recognition for involvement of parents, students, teachers, helping professionals and community residents in the life of the school.
(p. 300) Education and Community Building: Connecting Two Worlds, Institute for Educational Leadership, 2001 Many schools are working to improve results by aligning all aspects of their programs.
By forging closer connections among instruction, student services and parent involvement, schools ensure a sharper focus on their central concern: improved student achievement.
(p. 3) Community Schools: Improving Student Learning/Strengthening Schools, Families and Communities, A Handbook for State Policy Leaders, Coalition for Community Schools, Institute for Educational Leadership, 2002 When community schools provide supports for families, family involvement in school programs increases and family functioning improves.
In many instances, the quality of life in the community also improves (Dryfoos, 2000). (p. 3) An evaluation (of the Polk Brothers Foundation's Full Service Schools Initiative) by the Chapin Hall Center for Children at the University of Chicago found:...
When families see the school as a friend of the family and a safe haven, they are more likely to support the school in maintaining high expectations for learning and appropriate behavior.
(p.3) 113
Locations During the 2000-2001 school year, the Pennsylvania Department of Education funded thirteen school districts to operate Successful Students' Partnership truancy and dropout prevention programs.
For information regarding these sites and the strategies they are implementing, or for further information about truancy and dropout prevention, please contact: Dr. Maritza Robert, director PA Department of Education Bureau of Community and Student Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-3755 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: mrobert@state.pa.us Lynda Long Education Mentoring/Dropout Prevention Coordinator Center for Schools and Communities 1300 Market Street, Suite 12 Lemoyne, PA 17043 Voice: 717-763-1661 Fax: 717-763-2083 Email: llong@csiu.org
114
Student Assistance Program Statutory Authority: PA Act 211, Basic Education Circular 24 P.S. 15-1547 Drug 
Activities The Student Assistance Program is a process involving all of the following activities: Student Impact Chapter 4 and Standards The student impact is a result Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards of the total SAP process: and Assessment General Provisions: Improved attendance rates Section 4.2 ­ Purpose A team concept is utilized consisting of Academic Standards and Planning: educators; support staff, Drug and Alcohol Improved grades Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public and/or Mental Health liaisons that work Education Improved behavior and/or with students and their parents to remove Section 4.12 ­ Academic social skills barriers to learning.
Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Increased high school Teachers and support staff are trained to Curriculum and Instruction: recognize students experiencing barriers to diploma rate Section 4.21 ­ Elementary learning.
Education: Primary and Lowered school drop-out Intermediate Levels rates Team of educators, support staff, Drug Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level and Alcohol and/or Mental Health liaisons Increase in feelings of safety Education assist students and their parents in Section 4.23 ­ High School recognizing barriers to learning.
Education Improved positive (trust) Section 4.24 ­ High School relationship between staff Team of educators, support staff, Drug Graduation Requirements and Alcohol and/or Mental Health liaisons and students establish and maintain appropriate parent Decrease in rate of alcohol, Academic Standards for Reading, involvement throughout the Student tobacco, and other drug use Writing, Speaking and Listening Assistance Program process.
and abuse Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Team of educators, support staff, Drug Increase in opportunities for Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in and Alcohol and/or Mental Health liaisons connectedness with the All Content Areas identify and develop school based school Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing intervention plans to help students and and Interpreting Literature their parents remove barriers to learning Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing
Section 1.6 ­ Speaking and 115
Students are identified and given the opportunity to attend group sessions dedicated to specific barriers.
Students are identified and referred for assessments to determine if they need drug 
Team of educators, support staff, Drug and Alcohol and/or Mental Health liaisons develop post-vention plans for students that are returning students returning from inpatient treatment.
Team of educators, support staff, Drug and Alcohol and/or Mental Health liaisons develop transition* support plans for students involved with the SAP programs.
*transition from elementary to middle to high school.
Listening Section 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function of the English Language Section 1.8 ­ Research
Academic Standards for Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry
Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education Section 3.8 ­ Science, Technology and Human Endeavors Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education 116
Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living
Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.3 ­ Food Science and Nutrition Section 11.4 ­ Child Development
Research - Evaluation of Student Assistance Programs in Pennsylvania, July 1, 1998, to June 30, 1999, Submitted to: Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency, P.O. Box 1167, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17108-1167, Telephone 800-692-7292, Fax 717783-7713, October, 1999.
Submitted by: Carl I. Fertman, Ph.D. and Jo Schlesinger, M.Ed., University of Pittsburgh, Cele Fichter M.P.M., and Susan Tarasevich, M.Ed., St. Francis Institute for Psychiatric and Addiction Services, Xiaoyan Zhang, Ph.D. and Holly Wald, Ph.D, (formerly of St Francis Medical Center), XYZ Research Associates Commonwealth Student Assistance Program Performance Report 1999 ­ 2000, http://208.20.120.197/docs/Resources/report9900.htm Resiliency Research, National Network for Family Resiliency, http://www.nnfr.org/ Adolescent-Specific Treatment Research Review Literature, http://208.20.120.197/docs/Resources/literature.htm
117
Contacts:
Myrna M. Delgado, Chief Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-772-2813 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: mdelgado@state.pa.us
Kim Swarner Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-6777 Fax: 717-783Email: kswarner@state.pa.us
Dan Iser Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-787-6406 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: diser@state.pa.us
Marlene Kanuck Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-9294 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: mkanuck@state.pa.us
Sheldon Winnick Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-772-2066 Fax: 717-783-6617 Email: swinnick@state.pa.us
Margaret Innes Network for Student Assistance Services P.O. Box 953 Kimberton, PA 19442-0953 Voice: 610-935-8532 Fax: 610-935-8553 Email; region1@erols.com
118
Deborah Strayer Network for Student Assistance Services 1216 Pleasant Valley Boulevard Suite A Altoona, PA 16602 Voice: 814-944-4355 Fax: 814-941-6094 Email: dstreg6@aol.com
Marie Bozelli Network for Student Assistance Services Franklin Educational Center 139 Reiger Road Butler, PA 16001 Voice: 724-284-9183 Fax: 724-284-9186 Email: mboz183657@aol.com
Renee Urick Network for Student Assistance Services 6 South Main Street, Box 540 Washington, PA 15301 Voice: 724-222-7991 Fax: 724-222-7913 Email: rureg8@voicenet.com
Beth Sprentz Network for Student Assistance Services 300 Hospital Drive North Warren, PA 16365 Voice: 814-726-9626 Fax; 814-726-9652 Email: beths@penn.com
Sherry Peters MH SAP Coordinator Office of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services Department of Public Welfare Harrisburg State Hospital Beechmont Building #32 P.O. Box 2675 Harrisburg, PA 17105-2675 Voice: 717-772-7855 Fax: 717-772-7827 Email: c-speters@state.pa.us
Jose Pagan SAP Coordinator/ Drug 
119
21STCentury Community Learning Centers Statutory Authority: Title IV, Part B (Goals 1,2 and 5)
Program 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program provides funding for the establishment of Community Learning centers to provide academic, artistic and cultural enhancement activities to students and their families when school is not in session (before school, after school, Saturday and/ or during holidays or summer recess).
Activities Provide opportunities for academic enrichment, including providing tutorial services to help students, to meet State and local student academic achievement standards in core academic subjects, such as reading and mathematics;
Student Impact Increased academic achievement Increase in performance of PSSA test scores Increase reading and math skills Increase student study and organizational skills Increase graduation rates Reduce retention rates
Chapter 4 and Standards This instructional program can include all Academic Standards.
Chapter 4 ­ Academic Standards and Assessment General Provisions: Section 4.2 ­ Purpose Academic Standards and Planning: Section 4.11 ­ Purpose of Public Education Section 4.12 ­ Academic Standards Section 4.13 ­ Strategic Plans Curriculum and Instruction: Section 4.21 ­ Elementary Education: Primary and Intermediate Levels Section 4.22 ­ Middle Level Education Section 4.23 ­ High School Education Section 4.24 ­ High School Graduation Requirements Assessment: Section 4.51 ­ State Assessment System Section 4.52 ­ Local Assessment System Academic Standards for Reading, Writing, Speaking and Listening Section 1.1 ­ Learning to Read Independently Section 1.2 ­ Reading Critically in All Content Areas Section 1.3 ­ Reading, Analyzing and Interpreting Literature Section 1.4 ­ Types of Writing Section 1.5 ­ Quality of Writing 120
Provide a safe, stimulating, and adult supervised place to further intellectual, physical, social, and emotional development beyond the school day or periods when school is not in session.
Offer students a broad array of additional services, programs, and activities, such as youth development activities, drug and violence prevention programs,
Show improvement in measures such as attendance, decrease in disciplinary actions, decrease of alcohol and drug related incidents, used less violence, and decrease in other adverse behavior.
Enhances children's social, emotional and ethical behavior Increase involvement in school activities Increase student participation in
counseling programs art, music and recreation programs, technology education programs, character education, and service learning.
other subjects areas that impact academic achievement Improve students problem solving, critical thinking, social skills, and coping skills.
Increase attendance rate and attitude toward school Decrease dropout rate.
Section Section English Section
1.6 ­ Speaking and Listening 1.7 ­ Characteristics and Function of the Language 1.8 ­ Research
Offer families of students served opportunities for literacy and related educational development
Improved parental involvement, attitude and cooperation/ appreciation of school.
Provides adult education and other support services for families of participants such as social services and counseling
Academic Standards Mathematics Section 2.1 ­ Numbers, Number Systems and Number Relationships Section 2.2 ­ Computation and Estimation Section 2.3 ­ Measurement and Estimation Section 2.4 ­ Mathematical Reasoning and Connections Section 2.5 ­ Mathematical Problem Solving and Communication Section 2.6 ­ Statistics and Data Analysis Section 2.7 ­ Probability and Predictions Section 2.8 ­ Algebra and Functions Section 2.9 ­ Geometry Section 2.10 ­ Trigonometry Section 2.11 ­ Concepts of Calculus Academic Standards for Science and Technology Section 3.1 ­ Unifying Themes Section 3.2 ­ Inquiry and Design Section 3.3 ­ Biological Sciences Section 3.4 ­ Physical Science, Chemistry and Physics Section 3.5 ­ Earth Sciences Section 3.6 ­ Technology Education Section 3.7 ­ Technological Devices Section 3.8 ­ Science, Technology and Human Endeavors Academic Standards for Environment and Ecology Section 4.1 ­ Watersheds and Wetlands Section 4.2 ­ Renewable and Nonrenewable 121
Resources Section 4.3 ­ Environmental Health Section 4.4 ­ Agriculture and Society Section 4.5 ­ Integrated Pest Management Section 4.6 ­ Ecosystems and their Interactions Section 4.7 ­ Threatened, Endangered and Extinct Species Section 4.8 ­ Humans and the Environment Section 4.9 ­ Environmental Laws and Regulations Academic Standards for Civics and Government Section 5.1 ­ Principles and Documents of Government Section 5.2 ­ Rights and Responsibilities of Citizenship Section 5.3 ­ How Government Works Section 5.4 ­ How International Relationships Function Academic Standards for Economics Section 6.1 ­ Economic Systems Section 6.2 ­ Markets and the Functions of Governments Section 6.3 ­ Scarcity and Choice Section 6.4 ­ Economic Interdependence Section 6.5 ­ Work and Earnings Academic Standards for Geography Section 7.1 ­ Basic Geographic Literacy Section 7.2 ­ The Physical Characteristics of Places and Regions Section 7.3 ­ The Human Characteristics of Places and Regions Section 7.4 ­ The Interactions Between People and Places 122
Academic Standards for History Section 8.1 ­ Historical Analysis and Skills Development Section 8.2 ­ Pennsylvania History Section 8.3 ­ United States History Section 8.4 ­ World History Academic Standards for the Arts and Humanities Section 9.1 ­ Production, Performance and Exhibition of Dance, Music, Theatre and Visual Arts Section 9.2 ­ Historical and Cultural Contexts Section 9.3 ­ Critical Response Section 9.4 ­ Aesthetic Response Academic Standards for Health, Safety and Physical Education Section 10.1 ­ Concepts of Health Section 10.2 ­ Healthful Living Section 10.3 ­ Safety and Injury Prevention Academic Standards for Family and Consumer Sciences Section 11.1 ­ Financial and Resource Management Section 11.2 ­ Balancing Family, Work and Community Responsibility Section 11.4 ­ Child Development Academic Standards for World Languages Section 12.1 ­ Communication in a Target Language Section 12.2 ­ Communication in a Classical World Language Section 12.3 ­ The Role of Culture in World Language Acquisition 123
Section 12.4 ­ The role of Culture in Classical World Language Acquisition Section 12.5 ­ World Languages in the Community Section 12.6 ­ Classical World Languages in the Community Academic Standards for Career Education and Work Section Section Section Section 13.1 ­ Career Awareness and Planning 13.2 ­ Career Acquisition (Getting a Job) 13.
3 ­ Career Retention (Keeping a Job) 13.4 - Entrepreneurship
The list below describes some key resources on extended day programs.
This list is not meant to be exclusive.
Afterschool Alliance - www.afterschoolalliance.org A nonprofit public awareness and advocacy group dedicated to ensuring that all children have access to after-school programs by the year 2010.
The website includes policy information, research, and tips and information on how to advocate for after-school.
Specific Resources: A DECADE OF RESULTS: The Impact of LA's BEST After-school Enrichment Program on Subsequent Student Achievement and Performance is a longitudinal study report and a synthesis of research begun in 1990.
Program Tools: resources offered are intended to help by providing tools and tips on accessing funding and using communications to build support for programs.
The RAND Studies: an annual independent evaluation of Foundations' after-school programs' impact on participants' academic skills.
http://www.rand.org/child_area/ Coalition of Community Schools - http://www.communityschools.org Provides information on tools for sustainability and funding opportunities.
C. S. Mott Foundation - www.mott.org A leading partner in the U.S. Department of Education's 21st Century Community Learning Centers initiative, the C. S. Mott 124
Foundation is a private philanthropy that awards grants, in four program areas, in the United States and selected regions internationally.
Specific Resources: Learning Together: The Developing Field of School-Community Issues, a report chronicling the ideas, approaches, and strategies employed by 20 school-community initiatives across the United States.
Making After-School Count (Numerous Volumes): a publication on the important issues of after-school care.
Philosophy, Programs, and Procedures: Pathways Out of Poverty provides guidelines and application procedures for the Pathways Out of Poverty program that provides funding for improved education.
The Finance Project - www.financeproject.org This website is part of a series of technical assistance resources on financing and sustaining out-of-school time and community school initiatives developed by The Finance Project, with support from the DeWitt Wallace-Reader's Digest Fund.
Specific Resources: The Child Care Partnership Project is an initiative to develop and disseminate technical assistance materials on public-private partnerships for childcare, as well as to provide direct assistance to the state child-care administrators on how to create and sustain effective partnerships.
Out-of-School-Time Project provides technical assistance on financing and sustainability of after-school programs.
Starting Points is an initiative to provide and develop a series of publications and technical assistance materials designed to promote young children's readiness for school.
Using Title I to Support Out-of-School Time and Community Initiatives (January 2002, Vol. 2.
No. 4): a strategy brief about using Title I funds.
The Gateway - http://www.thegateway.org/welcome.html A one-stop, any-stop access to high-quality internet-based lesson plans, curriculum units and other education resources.
Browse subject and keyword lists, or search The Gateway Retrieved records will link directly to the Internet resources they describe.
The Gateway to Educational MaterialsSM (GEM) is a consortium effort to provide educators with quick and easy access to thousands of educational resources found on various federal, state, university, non-profit, and commercial Internet sites.
GEM is sponsored by the U.S. Department of Education.
125
General Services Administration - www.after-school.gov A one-stop shopping website for parents, teachers, after-school providers, and kids to learn about after-school resources from many different government and non-profit agencies.
Specific Resources: Bringing Education to After-school Programs Afterschool Action Kit Harvard Family Research Project ­ http://www.gse.harvard.edu/~hfrp/ The Harvard Family Research Project (HFRP), at the Harvard Graduate School of Education, builds on its expertise in evaluation and knowledge development to improve evaluation work and promote greater conversation and knowledge-sharing about evaluation among practitioners, policymakers, funders, researchers, and evaluators in the after-school field.
HFRP supports the development of quality information and capacity-building tools that will improve research and evaluation work and use of information in the field, especially at the local level.
Specific Resources: Federal Funding in Out-of-School Time with Accountability Requirements and Evaluations is a map of the afterschool field and detailed federal funding streams for after-school programs.
In addition, related programming is provided alongside their accountability requirements and evaluations.
Out-of-School Time Evaluation Database offers systematic investigation of the overall picture of evaluation work in the field of out-of-school time and a systematic way to investigate how different programs approach the evaluation task in order to support development of the field and its programs.
Out-of-School Time Issues of the Evaluation Exchange: quarterly newsletter highlighting issues in the out-of-school time arena and featuring articles by out-of-school time evaluators, researchers, and practitioners.
Laboratory for Student Success: The primary mission of the Laboratory for Student Success is to bring about lasting improvements in the learning of the mid-Atlantic region's increasingly diverse student population.
The ultimate goal of LSS is to establish a system of research, development and dissemination that connects schools, parents, community agencies, professional groups, and higher education institutions; gradually expands improvement efforts in the region to transform low-performing schools into high-performing learning communities; and is part of a national system of information exchange.
http://www.temple.edu/LSS
126
Specific Resources: The CEIC Review: This publication consists of full-length research articles focusing specifically on urban education reform.
The issue entitled "Pathways to School/Community/Family Partnership Results: Measures of Success and Student Learning", Volume 10 Number 1 January 2001 http://www.temple.edu/lss/pdf/ceicreviews/CEICVol10No1.pdf Mid-Continent Research for Education and Learning - www.mcrel.org A useful compendium of Internet resources and examples of innovative after-school programs compiled by one of the U.S. Department of Education-funded regional education laboratories.
National Center for Community Education (NCCE) - www.nccenet.org/index.html The National Center for Community Education provides state-of-the-art leadership development, training and technical assistance focusing on community and educational change emphasizing community schools.
National Community Education Association (NCEA) - www.ncea.com/ A non-profit membership association which provides leadership to those who build learning communities in response to individual and community needs.
Activities and information for members include national and regional training conferences and workshops; specialized periodicals, publications, and products; opportunities for peer support and networking; and information and referral services.
In addition, NCEA acts as an advocate for community education by working with related organizations and promoting at the national, state, and local levels: parent and community involvement in public education; the formation of community partnerships to address community needs; and the expansion of lifelong learning opportunities for all community residents.
National Institute for Out-of-School Time (NOIST)- www.wellesley.edu/WCW/CRW/SAC NIOST, at the Center for Research on Women at Wellesley College, has successfully brought national attention to the importance of children's out-of-school time, influenced policy, increased standards and professional recognition, and spearheaded community action aimed at improving the availability, quality and viability of programs serving children and youth.
Specific Resources: After-School Issues are a series of publications produced by NIOST on core after-school issues of interest including emerging roles in the field, focus on staffing, and focus on accountability.
Literacy: Exploring Strategies to Enhance Learning in Out-of-School Time (1999) explores, through research, different ways that after-school programs can support children's literacy development.
127
Making an Impact on Out-of-School Time is a new publication giving a comprehensive investigation to after-school care.
The National Governor's Association - www.nga.org The National Governor's Association has a Center for Best Practices with information on schools and after-school programs, among many other things.
Specific Resources: Extra Learning Opportunities, a web-based publication on giving information regarding best practices and recent activities in after-school programs.
EXTRA: Quarterly publication used to disseminate information on after-school issues and practices National Network for Child Care (NNCC) - www.nncc.org Extensive database of publications and a listserv supported by the U.S. Department of Agriculture's Cooperative Extension Service.
Specific Resources: NNCC School-Age Child Care Database: a resource that contains articles and abstracts about before- and afterschool care.
Topics include not-for-profit status for school-age care programs, selecting staff, and preventing conflict.
National School-Age Care Alliance (NSACA) - www.nsaca.org The only national membership organization representing the entire array of public, private, and community-based providers of afterschool programs, NSACA promotes national standards of quality school-age care for children and youth 5 - 14 years old, and grants accreditation to programs meeting the standards.
NSACA's mission is to build a profession that develops, supports and promotes quality after-school care.
Specific Resources: NSACA Standards at a Glance: a brochure containing an overview of the NSACA program improvement and accreditation system including all 144 standards.
NSACA Standards for Quality School-Age Care (in cooperation with the National Institute for Out-of-School-Time) -- a source of professionally recognized standards for the field of after-school.
This provides a valuable guide and model for quality that can be applied to all after-school programs, regardless of their particular focus.
128
School-Age Review: a journal with important developments in theory, research and practice in the after-school field.
Selecting a Quality After-school Programs provides a handy quality checklist with key questions helps families ask detailed questions when seeking a program for their child.
North Central Regional Educational Laboratory - www.ncrel.org/after A useful compendium of Internet resources and examples of innovative after-school programs compiled by one of the U.S. Department of Education-funded regional education laboratories.
Specific Resources: "Beyond the Bell": A Toolkit for Creating Effective After-School Programs allows one to make informed decisions about critical issues such as management, collaboration, programming, evaluation, and communication.
Strengthening Connections: a study by NCREL involving multiple facets of after-school care.
Northwest Regional Educational Laboratory - www.nwrel.org/learns A useful compendium of Internet resources and examples of innovative after-school programs compiled by one of the U.S. Department of Education-funded regional education laboratories.
Specific Resources: LEARNS: provides technical assistance to the Corporation for National Service projects focusing on literacy and education.
It features downloadable resources, innovative ideas for literacy practices and education-based national service projects.
Partnership for Family Involvement in Education (PFIE) ­ www.pfie.ed.gov The Department of Education administers the Partnership and offers resources, ideas, funding, and conferences relevant to family and community involvement in education, including after-school programs, and other resources.
Specific Resources: After-School Programs: Keeping Children Safe and Smart focuses exclusively on the benefits children receive in terms of increased safety, reduced risk-taking, and improved learning.
Gives information to corporations for partnership within the community to benefit school programs for youth.
129
The Southwest Educational Development Laboratory - http://www.sedl.org The Southwest Educational Development Laboratory (SEDL) is a private, not-for-profit education research and development (R
SEDL works with educators, parents, community members, and policymakers to build or find strategies and tools addressing pressing educational problems.
Then, SEDL works with them to put the strategies into practice so they can improve education for all students.
Specific Resources: Resource Guide for Planning and Operation After-School Programs: This document includes a description of resources to support after-school programs for school-aged children.
Also included are resources for before-school, summer programs and community learning centers.
These resources are timely, readily available and inexpensive.
http://www.sedl.org/pubs/fam95 University of California at Irvine ­ http://www.gse.uci.edu/afterschool/ca/ After-school staff training and program resource materials for local projects in California and beyond can be found on this very rich website.
U.S. Department of Agriculture - www.fns.usda.gov/cnd The Child Nutrition program of the Food and Nutrition Service provides information on the after-school snack program, including eligibility and reimbursement.
U.S. Department of Education - www.ed.gov The Department presents information about national education issues, publications, education statistics, and information about its different offices and programs.
For more about after-school programs, visit 21st Century Community Learning Centers at: www.ed.gov/21stcclc Specific Resources: 21st Century Community Learning Centers: Providing Quality After-school Learning Opportunities for America's Families is a publication on aspects of the 21st CCLC and a description of the initial challenges and successes of the program.
http://ed.gov/pubs/Providing_Quality_Afterschool_Learning/index.html Bringing Education to After-school Programs: helps after-school providers understand how to integrate academic content (e.g., reading and mathematics) into their programs to enhance children's learning.
130
Keeping Schools Open as Community Learning Centers: Extended Learning in a Safe, Drug-Free Environment Before and After-school is designed to help schools and community-based organizations begin their process of keeping neighborhood schools open for children and families.
Safe and Smart: Making After-School Hours Work for Kids highlights research evidence on the potential of afterschool programs to increase the safety of children, reduce their risk-taking, and improve learning.
http://www.ed.gov/pubs/SafeandSmart The updated version is entitled Working for Children and Families: Safe and Smart After-School Programs (April 2000) and can be obtained at the following link. http://www.ed.gov/pubs/afterschool/afterschool.pdf Department of Justice - www.usdoj.gov/kidspage This site provides information for children and youth on crime prevention, staying safe, volunteer and community service opportunities, and the criminal justice system.
Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention - http://ojjdp.ncjrs.org/index.html Specific Resource: Juvenile Offenders and Victims: 1997 Update on Violence: This report has given a face to juvenile crime and the juvenile justice system in the United States.
This report contains the raw information needed to address the problems of juvenile crime and victimization. http://www.ncjrs.org/pdffiles/juvoff.pdf In addition to websites, listserv opportunities exist: EDinfo Subscribe to this news service listserv with the latest information about the U.S. Department of Education at www.ed.gov/news.html ERIC Clearinghouse on Elementary and Early Childhood Education Subscribe to a joint ERIC Clearinghouse on Elementary and Early Childhood Education listserv where practitioners, policymakers, and parents share ideas, resources, problems, and solutions.
Send a message (without your e-mail signature if you have one) to: listserv@postoffice.cso.uiuc.edu.
Leave the subject line blank and just type subscribe SAC-L 
The after-school listserv, organized by the C.S. Mott Foundation, is hosted by the Academy for Educational Development.
The listserv is designed to provide a forum for the exchange of information, ideas, resources, and experiences.
To subscribe, send a message to ppas@aed.org.
Selected Published Research Articles on After-School Programs After-School Programs that Promote Child and Adolescent Development: Summary of a Workshop (2000).
Committee on Community-Level Programs for Youth, Jennifer Appleton Gootman, Editor, Board on Children, Youth, and Families, National Research Council, Institute of Medicine.
http://www.nap.edu/catalog/9944.html Community Programs to Promote Youth Development (2002).
Committee on Community-Level Programs for Youth, Jacquelynne Eccles and Jennifer Appleton Gootman, Editors, Board on Children, Youth, and Families, National Research Council and Institute of Medicine.
http://www.nap.edu/catalog/10022.html Beckett, M., Hawken A., Jacknowitz A. (2001) Accountability for After-School Care: Devising Standards and Measuring Adherence to Them.
Rand Corporation.
http://www.rand.org/publications/MR/MR1411/ Hamilton, Laura S., Vi-Nhuan Le, Stephen P. Klein.
(1999).
Foundations School-Age Enrichment Program: Evaluation of Student Achievement.
Rand Education.
Hanson, L. Extended Day: An Innovative Support Program.
The Hood Children's Literacy Project, Lesley College, Cambridge, MA. http://www.lesley.edu/academic_centers/hood/currentshome.html.
(March, 2002).
This paper describes and evaluates the effectiveness of the Extended-Day Academic Support Program (in Arlington, MA), a 10-week after-school program that focused on improving student achievement, specifically in writing.
It begins with the program's three goals: improving grade 4, 5, and 8 students' achievement in writing; providing professional development for teachers in the teaching of writing; and giving parents access to information about how they can help support their children's writing development at home.
The paper addresses organization of the program, program evaluation components, preliminary findings and results, and pre- and postassessment writing results.
It notes that teachers, students, and parents were generally positive in their perceptions of the program, and that, for the most part, posttests showed a great deal of growth, especially in topic development and organization.
Pierce, K. M, J. V. Hamm, and D. L. Vandell.
Experiences in After-School Programs and Children's Adjustment in FirstGrade Classrooms.
Child Development 70, 756-67, 1999.
This article relates children's experience in after-school programs to first-grade performance.
The study reported that positive staff behavior is associated with fewer behavior problems in boys, while negative reactions by staff was related to poorer reading and math 132
grades among the boys.
More frequent negative peer interactions in the programs was also correlated with increased behavior problems and poorer social skills.
Posner, J. K. and D.L. Vandell.
After-School Activities and the Development of Low-Income Urban Children: A Longitudinal Study.
Developmental Psychology 35, 868-79, 1999.
This paper studied after-school activities of third graders for two years.
It found that children attending after-school programs spent more time on academic and extracurricular activities; children in informal care spent more time watching television and "hanging out."
Posner, J. K. and D. L. Vandell.
Low-Income Children's After-School Care: Are There Beneficial Effects of After-School Programs? Child Development 65, 440-56, 1994.
This paper examined the effects of four different types of after-school care arrangements (formal after-school programs, mother care, informal adult supervision, and self-care) on 216 children from low-income families.
Children who participated in formal after-school programs had higher academic and conduct grades in school and spent less time watching television than children in the other care arrangements.
Schinke, S.P., Cole, K.C., Poulin, S.R. "Enhancing the Educational Achievement of At-Risk Youth," Prevention Science, 1, 1, 51-60, 2000.
Contacts: Dorothy Hershey 21st Century Learning Center PA Department of Education Division of Student and Safe School Services 333 Market Street, 5th Floor Harrisburg, PA 17126-0333 Voice: 717-783-7089 Fax: 717-783-6617 TTY: 717-783-8445 Email: dhershey@state.pa.us
133
